"The anxiety children feel at constantly being tested, their fear of failure, punishment, and disgrace, severely reduces their ability to perceive and to remember, and drives them away from the material being studied into strategies for fooling teachers into thinking they know what they really don't know."
“We’ve had people come to us and say, ‘You love your children so much more than we do,’” said Krista A. Clermont, 30, who serves as a church-planting missionary with her husband, Justin Clermont, in Chad.
The lace has been misted with Glimmer Mist Afraid Of The Dark (my new favourite), Patina, Bahama Blue, Suede and Walnut Gold.
Well, friends, it was the wrong conclusion. Baiser means to f***.
Alright, that's all for now. Back to my busy schedule.
1/2 cup white wine
As any dieter knows, the only food we don’t have to eat in moderation is vegetables. In fact, we’re encouraged to eat those veggies the way we used to eat chips, mmm, and cookies, yum, and ice cream, delish!, and…but, ahem, I digress.
One extra Session Head beer has been added (at the Pizzeria & Public House only), courtesy of Tim Eads at Starlight Distribution:
Para 50 unidades
I bought a ready-made pizza base and a block of mozarella cheese over the weekend.
It is a symbol for kindness and honesty, they secret words that opened up my mother's heart.
The easiest way to get reviews for your book is to create fake profiles and then review it yourself. (You'll be sure to get a 5 star rating!) However, many authors don't feel right about doing this. The next best way to get reviews for your book is to ask friends and family to read it and to post a review. They'll be likely to give you a favorable review, but you won't have to coach them on what to write. You can also send the staff at Amazon a copy of your book (digitally, of course) to review. They aren't likely to give you a bad review. Even if they don't like your book, they're more likely to just ignore your request. But chances are that you'll get an easy favorable review. The more reviews you get, the higher your book will appear in search results.
And the only way you will get repairs done at a reasonable price is to have an involved and communicative board that will share everything with owners. The power of an association is in the eyes and minds of owners who can cross-check what is going on. Smart boards use that available intelligence. Dumb, lazy, and ego driven boards do not, but many times all it takes is asking your board to make documentation available.
Now as we all know mermaids are born out of mermaids purses, which is presumably why groups of young women in the 1980's used to dance around their handbags down the disco in an attempt to lure mortal men to their sides. They were of course mimicking the mysterious and beautiful mermaids singing to the sailors and luring them to their doom.
from the tub.
Thank you again Steve...
Sometimes, hysterical!
This sweet little girl is part of my family and when you have a talent I think sometimes it needs to be given away. So this was my present to her parents.
Angel Food Cake
Where does one start? I suppose one could start with the famous bit of Thornton which is the house where the Bronte sisters were born before the family moved a few miles up the road to Haworth. Or one could feature the beautifully curvaceous Thornton railway viaduct which crosses the valley like an ancient relic: sans trains, sans rails, sans everything. But what really struck me about the village of Thornton, which is only two or three miles from the centre of busy metropolitan Bradford, was the way the little streets of old stone terraced houses threaded up the side of the valley, linking nothing with nowhere, pasture with moorland. I can't remember the name of this little street, but if you Photoshopped out the two cars and drained the shot of colour, it could have been taken at any point during the twentieth century.
the “rainbow”.
I Shalev, T E Moffitt, K Sugden, B Williams, R M Houts, A Danese, J Mill, L Arseneault and A Caspi
In 1933, Jerry Siegel and Joe Shuster dreamed up the comic strip hero with superpowers. They wrote about a baby cast adrift into the ocean of space by his parents to escape a doomed world. He landed on Earth and was adopted by a kindly couple, Jonathan and Martha Kent. When he exhibited “powers and abilities far beyond those of mortal men,” the Kents taught him to use those powers for the good of mankind. Unlike many of the modern comics whose heroes are as violent as the villains, Superman still fights for “truth, justice and the American way.” They were the original parents to Superman. They liked their creation but outta hunger and desperation, Siegel and Shuster sold their rights to Superman to DC Comics in 1938 for $138.
A variety of ingredients ar used in preparing Italian food, which range from dissimilar fruits and vegetables to rich cheese, cream and other milk products along with poultry, pork, seafood and fish. Outside of Italy, the most democratic dishes include pastas, pizzas and Italian breads, but Italian recipes also admit various types of soups, salads and sausages which ar highly apprehended by gourmets, sooner on with a glass of Italian wine.
that does not seem to be the way
Thus far, ed reforms rock stars have dodged accountability. Its the teachers, you see. Those tests and core standards we’ve invested in should have made everything better.
04 Honesty
Because nothing says love like being named after a fruit.
Americans have always loved a good shipwreck story. At the beginning of the nineteenth century, shipwreck narratives inundated the new nation. By 1806, nearly 200 book-length shipwreck narratives were available to the American public, including the first American edition of Archibald Duncan’s seminal anthology, The Mariner’s Chronicle. Some of my favorite turn-of-the-century shipwreck stories were told on the stage. The Shipwreck: A Comic Opera, arguably the most popular shipwreck-themed play of the time, first appeared in London in December 1796. The Shipwreck became an instant hit, crossing the Atlantic within a year. It was routinely performed as an aperitif to longer five-act plays performed on American stages between Boston and Charleston.
They turned around to face the other way.
4) Practical, Hands-on training and regular exams, assignments and group discussions
In all fairness, this didn't come from my brain. The geniuses at Melt Bar & Grilled, a grilled cheese restaurant for crying out loud, partner with a nearby theater to have regular movie nights. They design sandwiches to accompany the flicks. Yeah, they've got serious smarts. For a showing of the movie about the coolest turtles ever, they fashioned a pizza roll melt! Grilled cheese with pizza rolls! Cowabunga, indeed. The ingredients include: "Real cheese pizza rolls deep fried until extra spicy and atomic hot. Rich homemade marinara. Green ooze basil pesto cream cheese. Provolone and Romano cheese." You can add pepperoni. Here's their flyer advertising the special melt:
“TWO HOURS OF FREE AD TIME for a registered non-profit in Canada or Ontario that promotes or provides services that improve the equality, safety, awareness and/or human dignity of trans, transsexual, transgendered, two-spirited or intersex people.”So he wants money, free ads, control of our human resources and a ban on a potential client buying any ads from us for any reason or on any issue. This is starting to sound like a threat, it’s starting to sound like Michael Erickson, the NDP candidate and high school teacher wants to run this company.
Zombie Disco Squad sit at the forefront of modern day house music, taking influences from cultures around the world and melting them down into what has become a trademark sound. With a loyal following across the dance music spectrum, it’s never surprising to hear his tracks being spun by techno artists such as Luciano and Ricardo Villalobos, house legends Derrick Carter and Sneak to the likes of Radio 1’s Annie Mac, and even London’s Rinse FM.
This is Brittney our tour guide for the Olive Tour. The machine she is standing next to is called the Expeller. You pour the olives into the top of it and it basically presses the olive out of them.
Where is your Hope
“Wawawewa! Hackers everywhere! OMG they’ve hacked the government! *headspin*”
Florence and the Machine – “No Light No Light” I haven’t been too keen on the music from Ms. Welch and co. (too square and stuffy), but this sounds pretty cool. There’s darkness and urgency here and I can get behind that. Flo’s no slouch on the mic either. She rocks hot power belts all over the place and that note hold towards the end was killer! Nice booking, Voice!
The Storm
Brian has been a professional artist for five decades, during which time he has worked in every area of the illustrative arts ranging through book publishing, magazines, newspapers, government agencies, film, television and art education. Although he loved to draw maps in his childhood, he has only recently been asked to produce them for books, and the commission for "I am the Great Horse” came from book designer Ian Butterworth, with whom Brian has worked over many years.
And don't forget to visit each of the Design Team members' blogs to see who they have chosen as their favourite from last week's linky party.﻿
From the brokenness comes healing. From death comes life.
I hope you all are having a great summer!
"The Consultant"
these just makes me smile.
Ben McFarland for saying before the invention of Pilsner Urquell in 1842 "all beer was dark, cloudy and more often than not a little lousy".
The usefulness of the mobile phone in health promotion and behavior change has been tested with several randomized trials all over the world in recent years. Not surprisingly, the majority of the academic and private-sector research is done in developed countries for chronic problems such as diabetes, smoking, obesity, and heart disease. In developing countries, there are also studies on the effectiveness of mobile messaging for improving HIV/AIDS drug regimen adherence programs. At least one meta-analysis suggests that mobile phone is indeed helping diabetic patients and their healthcare providers globally.
Close the door,
--"they undeniably give local residents a sense of empowerment"
MJ on MMA
I was the red-haired boy in an old green flannel shirt
Hey girlies ;) So I haven't come across too many Halloween goodies on my favorite fashion or beauty websites, but I thought I'd share the few things that caught my eye :) I was going to put together a Bath & Body Works Halloween post...but guess what? They've already moved on to Christmas! Seriously, if you go to the website right now, it's a full-blown red/green winter wonderland...lol.
I don’t know how much longer she will live, but in so many ways, we’ve already lost her. Just like I lost my Grandma many months before she died. She was there physically. But she was somewhere else. Someone else.
I'm down to an X-Large, by the way.
So, WordArt for today. Yesterday wasn't that day - hehehe. Not an AHHHHH!!!!! moment. Some days are, don't get me wrong. Just not yesterday - LOL! I'm sure that I have a TON of pictures for this one, I just don't have the time/energy to go digging right now :) Now that I think of it, though, I need to take a picture of the bike cops, and blog that with the AHHHH!!!! WordArt. That would work! hehehe.
Hey everyone! Im back! I havent been blogging in awhile, because i have been busy welcoming the newest member of the Mr. Mixologist family into the world. My son Je'Qwuan Terrell was born Jan 3rd of this year. So its been a hectic first few months of the year to say the least.
I have been reading this blog and she has been doing project 31, 31 random acts of kindess. She has inspired me!! So as a random act of kindess today I threw someone's laundry into the dryer with a dryer sheet and started it!! I hope it brightens thier day. This was a total unplanned act so I did not have my camara with me, infact I had to go back up to my apartment and write a note and then put it in the laundry basket. The kids were there with me and the LOVED it, maybe this will inspire them :-) I hope to do more random acts of kindness and would gladly take some suggestions!!!
It was becoming apparent that I either needed a new and stronger lens or someone who could come along and give it a better clean than I was able to. Someone who was able to peer into the lens briefly and see exactly what I was seeing but through different eyes and give me a different perspective. I needed someone like my friend to point out that the lens wasn’t the problem but it was me that had become exhausted and weighed down. And looking through ANY lens when your brain has as good as packed it in, is bound to show a whole lot of stuff you don’t want to see.
We have a kegerator at work, and it is currently empty. It is empty because we can't seem to find a decent source of small/pony kegs. When we have giant parties, we go thru standard sized kegs, no problem. But our office staff of 9 can't seem to kill a keg in a timely manner, and the lines get gross, and by then, well, it's just too late. We all like interesting beer, and variety. We have good beer in the fridge, but it just seems like a waste to have a kegerator and not use it.
Best UK brewery
The boy believes in magic, hoping that God’s magic will bring good to him and his mother without the help of wealthy men. When he and his mother and Uncle Roque go to the ball game, the green of the field is a “magic light.” When he catches the ball, it is like magic, with no bobble, and he feels every set of eyes and every voice in the stadium. It is like magic when someone in the bus tells him that he will get everyone to sign the ball. But Erick’s magic is undercut by the mysterious magic of his mother when he reads the note, in which a ballplayer asks his mother to come to the hotel for a drink.
Brett who is also nearby hears Emmy's cries as well and starts searching harder. The old man arrives at the hole first, tosses down a rope and hauls her out, taking her back to his cabin. However, Brett has seen all of this and now knows where Emmy is.
1. Adherence to a religion must be a personal choice;
My first introduction to this marvelous style was when I was strolling through The Bombay Company many years ago. During those days, they had a series of coffee tables, secretariats, side tables and various other products made in the British campaign style. I remember being taken with the look almost immediately. The clean lines, the natural wood, the brass fittings… all spoke to me of a time when the practicalities of life in the field did not mean giving up the niceties of life! In fact, the harder the cross-country ordeal, the more of a need to be reminded of England and what exactly one was fighting for out in the wilds. It is precisely when one is put in primitive conditions that one should cling all the more strongly to one’s civilized manner and style of life.
cards made with hearts on them...
I ate :
Jules in Winter 2011 (archive)
I wanted to give a special "HEY THERE" to my good friend Auntie Marge for sending me a funny little poem that goes a little like this:
“Yes Indeed–” Iliad starts to say as he rides by, but can’t get his horse to stop once more, and so he is gone.
Your level of susceptibility to illness, disease and mental health problems increases with stressful events happening in your life.
Just as important, do you have critique partners and writing friends to help you solve problems?
ROM 1:24 Wherefore God also gave them up to uncleanness through the lusts of their own hearts, to dishonour their own bodies between themselves:
Tim was forced to eat a giant piece of cake from the winning decorated cake from the timed competition. It was a full sized wedding dress with trail behind.
Nickname
and spread a white cashmere shawl
It is a good thing that we thought of bringing our sat-nav (satellite navigation).
In the last month, I have made a killing over there and items are selling faster than I can stock them.
Why do we have 2 DSLRs? Simple - one is a backup. When you're shooting for money, you can't tell that Tahitian Ukele Maker that the camera is busted and we'll have to come back another time. You bring two bodies, each with a suitable lens.
This Saturday I woke up around 10:24 am, after having gone to sleep at around 7:00 am. Needless to say I didn’t plan to stay awake all night. It just happened to be that way because a friend was online and I couldn’t pass on a night of fun.
2. I recently saw the person who had been profiled in our local paper as the winner of the shire sustainability award loading her vegetables into plastic bags. I had snooty thoughts (despite the strong probability that she planned to use those plastic bags as nappies for orphaned koalas).
Can't I drop what I am doing and respond to them just one minute, or even one second, quicker?
It is time I get back to remembering all that the Lord has done in my life.
release out of the source of my lover's joy
Now, you might think that they're going to take you off the beaten track, and in some cases that's true. Most tourists don't get up to Inwood in Manhattan or out to the Bronx. But they do go to Ellis Island and Liberty Island, though they likely don't know that Ellis Island's Main Building was built on top of a Native American burial site, or that the island where the Statue of Liberty stands was a Native American shellfish-gathering station and hunting and fishing camp.
“Creativity shouldn’t be seen as something otherworldly. It shouldn’t be thought of as a process reserved for artists and inventors and other ‘creative types.’ The human mind, after all, has the creative impulse built into its operating system, hard-wired into its most essential programming code,” writes Jonah Lehrer in his new book, Imagine: How Creativity Works. …
Oude Beersel Framboise
Would like to play along, then head over to CAS-ual Friday blog to read all the rules and see more inspirations. And then link your projects to the linky :) All the best. Can't wait to see what you come up with :)
25) It’s girls like you that make days like this, all the more beautiful! +
existence is the basic form of participation
Good advice
Rauch then moved to with what he felt was a vital important point for everyone to know, whether consumer, restaurant owner, supermarket owner, fishermen, etc. He claimed that when a fish is legally caught by a U.S. mandated fishery, then it is sustainable, considering the fact that the U.S. fishing industry is the most highly regulated in the world. This presupposes that their scientific assessments are fully accurate. Sustainability thus becomes a black and white issue, easily determined by adherence to the government mandate. But can it really be that simple?
First, I will mention that my goal is to have the younger two boys sleeping between 7:30 and 8:00, and our older son between 8:00 and 8:30. Getting there is going to be a two week phase, since right now they are heading to bed around 10ish.
The sound of saliva in microphones. Seriously, how hard is it to swallow your freakin spit? The sound, legitimately, makes me cringe.
I suppose in the final analysis, the wait is never as long as it seems when you stop waiting. We heard from our social worker and she is actively preparing the home study for us. She had some additional questions to ask us this morning, which we happily answered. She has already sent us a draft to review and will be in contact with our agency today as well. She stated that she expects to have the home study done this week. I am so hopeful and praying that we can submit our I800 A this week. If not, it will be early next week. It is all prepared and ready to go.
So, what motivates your doubt and how to do you get rid of it?
The Expert’s Opinions
Labour 487,884 votes and 394 councillors.
We have to make a little history here. This 1932 independent horror film is considered to be the first, full length zombie film ever released. Zombies have made a big come back in recent years, but for my money, they often rely too much on gore. Unlike the classics here in which tone suspense make up for a lack of make up know how.
After they had a drink they raised their heads and curled their upper lip way back. Funny to see!
See him smiling
10-04 San Diego, CA – Cricket Wireless Amphitheatre #%
A week ago, my friend Andrea Shelton emailed me about a young man in need. His name was Aaron, and she had learned about him from Kimberly Hutchins-Watch, who has taken in—and adopted– numerous foster children over the years. Kimberly also runs Seeds of Love to gather clothing, provisions and funds for foster kids and although she didn’t know Aaron, a DFCS (Department of Family & Children Services) worker “knew her heart” as Andrea put it, and called to see if she could help. Aaron was 18 and heading off to college in a day or two, but since he had just maxed out of the foster care system, he really had nothing to call his own. And I mean nothing. (When foster kids turn 18, they are “emancipated” from the system and lose their foster home. Over 400 kids every year are turned out — many to homelessness, teenage parenthood and a vastly uncertain future.)
Over-Equipped (20) – Weaponized 10 vehicles
There are many other taxes in this bill, such as limiting itemized deductions on only those making $200k individual/$250k joint filing, which could easily be challenged under the equal protection clause, something one would think our Constitutional teacher president would know. There would be a change to the way “carried interest” is taxed (there is bipartisan opposition to this idea). Oh, and taxing the oil and gas industry, which would supposedly raise $40 billion, meaning $40 billion in higher costs to the American people
30) THE TREMBLER – Duane Eddy
On our way to Asheville, North Carolina, in early April, Betsy and I stopped at a rest area along I-40 in the mountains of western North Carolina. The day up to that point had been sunny and bright, but the weather forecast was calling for rain. While at the rest area I noticed the clouds over the ridge line. The sky was still blue, and there were still white clouds in the sky, but the gray clouds were moving in. We did, in fact, get rain later in the day.
Editorial. Liveraf chose to publicise the Liverpool Echo’s report of this story, beacuse it is the most comprehensive we have seen. However, it has also been reported in several of the national dailies and it has even made the Irish Times . Locally, anti-fascists are hoping for an appropriate dispensation of justice, which in this case would amount to the authorities locking up the odious Mr. Whitby and forgetting where they put the key. If all goes well, we may have seen the last of Mike Whitby’s activities in Liverpool and, one hopes and prays, the final demise of the BNP on Merseyside. Nationally of course, this can only constitute one more nail in the coffin of the British National Party RIP.
To borrow an often overused saying (and a pun in this case), "it's a chicken and egg problem". You need hunters to help train hunters, but fewer hunters means fewer trainers, which means fewer hunters...
THE CAMPAIGN (Aug 10) – Will Ferrell and Zack Galifianakis play rivals in a campaign election to be the next president of the United States directed by Jay Roach, who’s made both Meet The Parents and Game Change. It sounds like a funny combination, but in my opinion I haven’t liked many of Ferrell’s movies in recent years, but this could prove me wrong.
Id really like to be moving quicker than I am.
who practice such things deserve to die, they not only do them but give
- Melta Bombs
Sounds easy right?
9. Holding me while I cry myself to sleep.
6:00-6:15 Break
This is one of my absolute favourite blogs! Tita Buds is definitely a versatile blogger, her posts vary from cute things to travel pics and everything inbetween and her writing always makes me smile. She is also a middle child like me and comes across as a genuinely lovely person.
The old friend got the bills in the mail, including one for $5,972 from a Fort Pierce hospital, according to the affidavit.
How to Connect:
Now there are aspects of the film I did quite enjoy. The look and fashion sense of the film, caught somewhere between the denizens of Emerald City and the post-millennial club kids of the NYC dance scene (seriously, why doesn't Lady Gag have a cameo here), are rather alluring, but even that only went so far and stopped. The main problem with the film though, is the film's idea of satire. Attempting, one assumes, at creating a time and place where one can criticize the ideas of reality TV and modern society's desensitized outlook on violence, Ross's film ends up playing to this targeted demographic instead of taking aim at them. But then, perhaps this is just me reading too much into the probabilities and possibilities of such a story that has ingrained essences of Lord of the Flies and A Brave New World (and let's not forget the 2000 film Battle Royale which already did this near-exact scenario more than a decade ago - and did it better) hidden behind lines and scenes that never play out as the demented social commentary they should. In other words we are meant to revel in kids killing kids and go rah rah rah all the way home, without ever getting anything else out of it.
Most digital cameras with very low capacity Flash memory cards, and the Fuji F10 is no exception. 16 MB xD-card is included in the box when you buy the F10
1) It's concert week, which means everything that can go wrong must go wrong. Including the fact that I am now on steroids (more on that in Random Thought #2) and my car is dead. I am hoping the battery just needs to be jumped back to life. Otherwise, I'm pretty screwed.
Without a
With dawning delight,
I followed the directions, it said it actually sets and is ready for re-coating every 30 minutes. So, I just wrapped up my brush with some plastic wrap and stuck it in the fridge in-between coats. It definitely was a magnetic primer, I didn't even bother trying to salvage the brush at the end of all 5 COATS! Yes, I did 5, just call me a Jedi master because I wanted to be sure that the magnetic force would be strong with this one.
“This is one of the best chocolate breads you’ve made,” she says to me.
When Lisa from A Food Gypsy came into Coriander Girl last week offering hand delivered fresh made soups, I thought, "This is a good idea. It's meals on wheels but soup and she's usually on foot so maybe it's nothing like meals on wheels! Or like any other take out because it's so different. It's fresh beautiful ingredients, sourced locally and the mason jar can go to great use here! She had me at summer split pea and dill and next week is tasty asparagus and leek. Nutritious gourmet soups in my fridge every week to get me through these long wedding work days, mom would be happy!
As the train pulled into the station and we poured in, a young boy was sitting on his mother’s lap, babbling loudly. Passengers got frustrated as it continued, and the mother did little to quiet her son.
Nah. I just branched out in certain other directions for a creative outlet. That, and the day job has REALLY been cutting into my time to write. And I also needed to break with my damned Farmville addiction. It used to be a fun time waster but now it's such a pain in the ass that it's like having a second full time job. There are probably real farmers who spend less time and aggravation on real farms than I've been spending on the 4 farms I operate in Farmville.
BRETTON WOODS SET THE STAGE
I am reminded that all things work together for my good because I love you and you make me fit into your purpose.
In comparison to the previous year, their turnover increased to Rs. 339,792 Crore by 31. 4 %. Even their exports have strengthened this year by 41.8 % to Rs.208, 042 Crore. Their Profit before Tax climbed to Rs. 25,750 Crore i.e. by 2.0 %.
The image is a stamp that I found when tidying up my collection. I think it came from the Glitter Girls. I stamped the image on glossy photo paper and coloured it in with promarkers. The green elements are the same green sakura pen that I used for the stitching and I also added some gold sakura pens to the flowers on her hat which you can't see in the photo but is very glittery.
And holy smokes, does that cover look pretty. I'll fully admit that I judge a book by its cover - at least at first. Also, by its font, the texture of its pages, its smell. All love starts with lust. Or at least it does with me. But these books are worth that first flush of desire. They're sly. Meaty. Heartbreaking. And I can't WAIT for the next installment.
In short, as a New Orleans prosecutor once said, “Corruption is not about greed, and it’s not about need; it’s about opportunity.” As long as public officials have the opportunity to abuse the public trust, with little fear of being caught or punished, they will do so — especially in a social context where high status comes with powerful obligations to reward one’s kin and supporters and to “share the wealth.”
If there's one thing I can't do, it's figuring things out. At least, I don't feel like I can. When I was younger, probably in high school, I tried really hard to know what I wanted to do with my life, but I never really planned it out. I definitely was not one of those girls who knew by what age she wanted to get married and then have children. Trust me, the whole concept was lunacy to me. I did, however, always know that I wanted to be a teacher or work with children in some capacity. So, I guess you could say I tried to figure it out.
So starts Peter Mayle's A Year In Provence. A long, lazy lunch on New Year's Day in a nice restaurant is a popular way to celebrate the start of another year in France. For some its a soothing antidote to any excesses of New Year's Eve, for others an amiable alternative to partying all night. We took to New Year's Day lunches right away when we came to Provence, and this year we decided that it was the perfect time to see once again why the Cabro d'Or in Les Baux, is one of our walkprovence.com clients' favorite destinations........
YES! I'm STILL running! I am on week 4 of my Couch 2 5K program and have worked up to running for a whole 2.5 minutes at a time! WHOOO HOO! I know... it doesn't sound like much... but trust me... it's an eternity when a body is as out of shape as this body is! But it's getting in BETTER shape! I have finally lost ALL of the weight that I had regained after I had lost all that weight 3.5 years ago! And I have actually lost a few more pounds... so I am finally on my way to my goal again! YAY me!
peck out of their crackled wax-dyed shells.
“You are springtime,” he said to me.
For that matter, could ‘Allah’, too, not be translated?
So basically, you are using your family who probably hates that you are on this show to compete for love and are worried that you will get your heart sexually assaulted on national television to try and win the opportunity to film an episode of tier one porn on a three-way vacation that plays more like an episode of Big Love. By the way, tier one is network porn, tier two is softcore porn (Skinamax if you will) and tier three is what your boyfriend/husband has hidden on your home computer.
This past weekend was amazing. I knew as soon as my dad told me that him and Mom were going to a classic car show in Myrtle Beach that I wanted to go. The only problem was Alex had to work that weekend and I didn't want to go by myself. Insert Jill. I knew she would go with me and went she did. We left right after school Friday afternoon and we were on our way by 3:30. We arrived in MB at the hotel where my parents were staying (we didn't stay on the beach) around 7:45. We unloaded the cars and met with my parents in their room. My parents had already eaten but they decided to ride along with Jill and me to grab a bite. After dinner it was an early bedtime since morning would come too soon.
Ohhh its Friday my last day off work, at least I've managed to spend time crafting and catching up although after the Easter rush it will be quiet for a few weeks now on the plus side I've still got a couple of weeks left to take before July, being as we won't be going away this Summer due to my Son doing his Masters at Uni. I'm going to have a week off to do some decorating, just need to find some paper.....
NEW YORK (CNNMoney) — The share of young adults with jobs has hit its lowest level since the government started keeping records just after World War II.
My take on the current introductory line for Inverhouse: They are fine to drink, but I'm not going to run out and buy them. If you like these profiles (light and malty for the anCnoc, sweet for the Balblair), you might want to check them out, but I found them one dimensional.
The day after I arrived (one week after these family arrangements), my host sister, mother and I went to Khemisset for the weekend where Rashid lives for the official engagement party. It was similar to the one I experienced in my training site with my first host family. Many extended family members were there from both sides. For the first couple of hours, all the women sat downstairs drinking tea, eating snacks, and chatting while the men sat upstairs. Engagement arrangements were made and once finalized, my host aunts yelled out their high-pitched ceremonial screams and everyone came to congratulate my host sister. Singing, clapping, dancing and music followed. An elaborate dinner was served (genders still separated) and once everyone had stuffed themselves full of delicious food, the women went upstairs to join the men. Fatima-Zahra came up last and saw her finance for the second time ever. They awkwardly sat together on one couch staring down at the floor away from each other while gifts were presented to them (such as clothing, candy, and sugar). Henna was put all over my host sister’s hands and feet. Rashid’s mother then passed a huge wad of cash to my host uncle who stood-in as the head man of the family since my host father was away at work across the country. He counted the money aloud: 4,000 Moroccan dirhams, equal to about $500.
Meanwhile, toss all the ingredients for your corn cakes into a bowl - except for the water. Mix well. Add the water 1/4 cup at a time, just until your mixture comes together so you can work with it.
IMAGINE… if you will, that the brave warriors who fought to preserve Great Britain from tyranny during the Second World War have been resurrected and allowed to visit modern day Britain to see for themselves the fruits of their sacrifice.
So no - I don't think it's good news that a mean, ruthless, cost focussed, heartless, acquisitive, jealous company run by people who don't even like beer has bought one of the best craft brewers in the world.
The Malays are not receptive enough to all the talks about Islam by UMNO, as they see decadences and debaucheries affecting the party – from alleged corruption to all sorts of scandals. The Malays are even aware that all the denials to these alleged depravities are part of UMNO’s game in politics.
10 minutes later Antonio Valencia was brought on for Scholes and Nani moved over to the left wing. Mancini was obviously worried about Valencia as he responded by bringing on another centre-back in Micah Richards. City, now operating with a back 5, had Lescott free to cover in behind Clichy as he stayed tight to Valencia, as he had done with Nani.
You don't have to use a KD image to play along or to be entered in the random drawing for 2nd and 3rd place. In order to be chosen card of the week and your choice of 3 digis, you'll need to use a KD image.
…is mostly pantomimed domestic fray:
My migraines are triggered by oranges, chocolate, soft cheese, stress, tiredness and my period. Normally it’s a combination of the above, and I am on preventative medication. I’d just like to be a bit more in control as they are so diabilitating when I get them, it’s like a disability and I live in fear of another attack.
world whirling on its axis
backwards.
it seems i only post here for holidays
- "Let's take training horses. Don't you think that -- that some people, horse whisperers or others, had some, you know, some insights into the best way to train horses? And that should have been patentable on your theory." (Scalia)
At the summit, a muffled public address system emanates from Eagle Heights Wildlife Park, where a flying display is under way. The sound echoes across the countryside as I continue along the ridge parallel to the line of a hedge abundant with scarlet rose-hips and crimson dogwood. A solitary oak marks the point where the path turns to descend between buttery field maples into denser woodland and the valley bottom once more.
Vulture wonders if Lifetime executives, upset at Gunn's criticism of the producers, pulled the video, which of course is still easy to find.
Matt Cavanagh also has a go, in The Spectator, but he ends up reiterating sentiments expressed in earlier articles, and in particular his piece last November. His conclusion this time is that we now have an opportunity "to move towards a more honest and realistic debate about the Afghan campaign and its prospects of success, in public as well as private".
Beverly Curry, 41, New York, N.Y.
Attention Deficit Disorder (ADD) and Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD) is a disorder that is found most commonly among children. Lack of attention, impulsive behavior, and issues of distraction characterize this disorder.
Well so lot has changed. though thankfully one thing has stayed the same. Food lion is going pretty well. Had a bit of trouble but now I have a gold star, one of my managers christy told me she noticed I am a hard worker. So for that I am glad. Sometimes customers are really annoying ( leaving register to get stuff or if they forget card, raising cain if something isn't on sale though it's not my fault , not helping back even though there is a loooooooot of stuff etc) but for the most part it's good. So I am glad for that. Oh and reaaaaaally long shifts can suck too. Which I have tomorrow. yaay. I also have had to work sunday mornings which suck.
Things start to get interesting when a woman named Alicia calls him repeatedly to write a feature about her dead husband. The problem is her husband is no one special. He’s just an ordinary guy who lead an average life. Still, Gordon’s “instinct” buzzes and he decides to follow the story. As he digs into the details, not only does he find an intriguing story, but he also falls in love with Alicia. Up to this point, Gordon seems to be a well-adjusted and normal guy, but once he starts pursuing this woman all his insecurities and faults come to light. For lack of a better description, he’s a little nutty.
(Photo Credit: Moose, 4/20/12, College Park, MD)
Change someone’s day, week, or life with a single image. Thanks.”
.....my hips hurt again. I don't think ballet is good for my health. Turn out I cannot.
finding it extremely difficult to get Central/State Government jobs, govt. housing & other govt. facilities. And finding it difficulty in getting civic facilities. And finding it difficult in preventing the state
Part of the reason I am writing about a few Bolo flicks is to honestly just see more of his catalog. I'm not sure I've ever been a fan of an actor when I've seen as little as I actually have. The other reason is I just finally needed to break my streak and start writing shit again, and what better way to do so than with the Beast from the East... MISTER Tough Tits himself????
Papers: Graphic 45, 'Halloween in Wonderland'
Many have said Karna was wrong in calling Draupadi a whore while she was being stripped by Durshasan. He said that saying that a women having more than one husband is a whore (as Draupadi had five Pandavas to be called as Husbands).
The “legacy” you are creating for yourself is not what you think it is.
He then cites several passages of Scripture in which he justifies God’s involvement in everything from large to small, including the outcome of football games. Seeing as how I am not a Calvinist, I was quick to reject this point. I believe it is dangerous territory to start delineating lines of blessing and curse based on football and university allegiances. I recognized what Nomel was doing with identifying Auburn’s plight and rise with emotions elicited in the Psalms, but was fairly uncomfortable with going so far as to say that God was causing us to win.
As far a horror graphics go, this one is pretty scary. Check out the obesity levels in 2020. By the way, it says that the average American eats 3,800 calories a day. I know I haven’t been packing back that much. So which one of you is snarfing my fries?
as well as my bed
We grabbed our suitcases and dashed back out of the station, down the sidewalk, bump-bump-bumped back down the concrete stairs to the Metro, shoved our coins into a blue machine and were rewarded with Metro tickets. Just like we lived there. Just like we knew what we were doing. Just like Rick Steves was our best friend.
If a god exists, and specifically the Christian god, then the bible was not written by him, because it just isn’t correct about anything! Even Christians will admit that the bible was not god-written or god-inspired; it was written by desert, goat herders that knew nothing of the natural world and wrote stories to try and make sense of it as well as for entertainment and political reasons to control the fearful people.
CHICAGO – The Board of Directors of The Three Arts Club of Chicago (3Arts) announced today that on June 8 the board voted unanimously to sell the 3Arts building at 1300 N. Dearborn and establish a grantmaking foundation with the proceeds from the sale.
Here was the plan...
"And under His wings, you will find refuge."
06 Crowded Room
Government Revenue 2008 $2.6 Trillion
Tseung Kwan
And, maybe a Razorback victory in the Cotton Bowl. And another Saints Super Bowl ring.
During apartheid, every one of the 74 deaths in SA police custody up to 1994 was widely condemned in screaming headlines and frantic international protest campaigns. Under the ANC regime, deaths in custody soared to 695 in 2006 and reached 860 deaths in 2010. Only the annual Amnesty International summaries have some paragraphs tucked away mentioning this horrific fact. No screaming headlines, no frantic international protest actions. Why did world opinion come to such a screeching halt once the ANC came to power?
When Mijah presented himself on Oct 23, he was arrested also on suspicion of causing “mischief by fire” in connection with the fire that occurred at the logging camp of the two companies at Sebuyau, Sebangan.
You know, he did pass the Lily Ledbetter Act. That has probably done more for American women than all the finger-shaking at Bill Maher could ever do.
We all know where that road went with P, but I'm proud to say that I (think?) I'm addressing P's issues and doing the best I can to make sure that she ends up a good citizen even when I have the gall to ask her to canter on the right lead.
As a young military couple Dave and I made four moves, had two children, lived through three hurricanes, and experienced two deployments–all within our first seven years of marriage. Our life was exciting, tiring, and unpredictable--and we loved sharing it.
A few short hours of sleep later, we had a nice breakfast, and then headed to the awards ceremony. I got to see some old hundred-miler friends, and quite a few of the Midwest Contingent. Andy and Greg both took their turns hobbling-up to the front of the room to get their handshakes and buckles. It was a glorious end to a jam-packed weekend.
The favorite thing about creating is having someone love what I do. They don’t have to own it. Just knowing that there is love means the world to me. Collecting? The hunt and then finding something that I did not know I wanted or needed. Then, displaying my treasures in a way that makes me smile when I see them.
jillian and carmen and ken, a long long time ago.
- 1/2 c. of plain yogurth
Menu: VolumeManager/Disk/ExcludeDevices
GZ
Wind.
It is no different for the children of today. The social, cultural and situational conditions of people however vary so it is not always easy to tell your child about it all. But given a choice – would you rather want your child to obtain this vital information from you or, through pornography, ill informed friends, the net or even an accidental sexual encounter! The problem is that even when some parents understand the urgency of the situation there are the ‘moral policemen’ and legislators themselves who claim that sex education goes against the culture of the society.
Thus ran the ad in freecycle.. Freecycle, if you've never met it, is like a sort of Craigslist for people who want to give things away and recycle by re-using rather than dumping them. (Oh. Yes, just as in Craigslist, spelling and grammatical correctness are optional on freecycle.)
I stole a previous idea and just covered some soup cans with pretty scrapbook paper, and presto chango, free utensil storage:
Since I met you Iâ€™m not the same
and it sounded a lot easier.
Pardon Me While I Scream
Prepare filling first as it will have to be stored in freezer for up to 2 hrs before baking the muffins. Combine the cream cheese and maple syrup until smooth. Transfer the mixture to a piece of plastic wrap and shape into a log about 1½-inches in diameter. Tightly wrap the plastic wrap around the log and transfer to the freezer until at least slightly firm.
I think I'm going to need to think about these before I start the post.
5. Political parties love democracy, as it seems to be fair to everyone. Anyone can bid for any place in the party, including the top most. That is the theory at least.
The day started with a warm glass of water with a dash of cayenne and a squeeze of lemon followed by a pint of Green Juice. I used the Crazy Sexy recipe instead of the recipe we used for our previous juice fast, and I must say this recipe is much more palatable. The one part of this cleanse I was not looking forward to was the Green Juice every morning, but now I don't mind it at all! Lunch was a delicious spinach, avocado and tofu "egg(less) salad" bowl. In the afternoon I snacked on a pear with some almond butter. Dinner was a mix of raw veggies in a almond butter based thai sauce that I made in the blender. For an evening snack I had some fresh strawberries and a one inch square of 72% cacao dark chocolate. Throughout the day I sipped green tea with cinnamon, almond milk, and a touch of agave. Not bad, right? I found that at the end of the day I still had a ton of energy, where as I am usually ready to drop dead by 11pm. Day one completed, and I'm still psyched for the next 20 days (and beyond!)
10 Fall of the Peacemakers 6:55
13. The Undertaker's Thirst For Revenge Is Unquenchable. (The Final Battle)
Having clients with a desire to shop for a sales bargain is a given in any business. Knowing how handle objections like these and get them to stop shopping and make the decision to own is a skill. You must understand that it’s pretty normal that we all want the newest, best, shiniest, fastest, and brightest when it comes to making product purchases. But, no one wants to pay too much for it. Before you can use the words that I’ll give you in just a moment to address this situation, you have to know what you’re up against.
So brutalised and intimidated have the British public become by the one word, that they often behave like abused children, denying naughtiness before they are even accused of it, we see this all the time when people are interviewed about immigration on TV when the first thing they always say is "I'm not a racist but ...." or display embarrassment at their failure to embrace all aspects of politically correct orthodoxy. For instance the middle class, middle aged woman I recently saw talking about the impact of immigration, at one point admitting the country had been “totally changed”, however her body language made it obvious she was clearly ashamed and embarrassed to even mention such blasphemy and afraid people would think less of her for saying it.
beautiful or attractive woman should look like.
There is a website called "Gail Wilson Designs"
Steam in greased idli moulds for 10-12 minutes.
David D. Alger, 57, New York, N.Y.
Leanne's strength is you can love her or hate her but you cannot ignore her!
The way I keep forgetting that my friend is moving to Chicago.
But the Government watchdog has blocked it on the grounds that eating an egg for breakfast every day does not constitute a healthy diet.Well, the flip flop health advice has flopped the other way now.
Bible Atlas for the iPad
Lastly (or at least for now, I think I may have an Amazon addiction!) Another book which I am hoping will prove useful.
the becoming thought, to stake off no beginnings or ends
I know you see tennis balls, cut open and stuck on the bottom of many two wheeled walkers. Visit any senior center and every other two-wheeled walker has the tennis balls on the back legs. They can even look like fun as they are brightly colored.
I actually quite enjoyed it. Away from everything. I remember doing the same kind of thing along the Rhine with a french stick, bottle of dandelion and burdock and some kind of cheese that smelled like it had been sat inside an old womans sock for 10 years. I watched the tourism cruise boats arrive, turn around and moor along the river. People getting off and milling around, then coming back to the boat that started it’s engines and off they all went… onto greener pastures…
Something happens when we start praying for other people. Once we catch the glimpse of another person through the eyes of God, our attitude toward them changes. We are being tinged by His grace to treat them well and find ways to help them. As we experience His grace, we can’t help but share it with others.
All Ambiga could guarantee was a long walk to Dataran Merdeka and the hope that, if everyone kept calm, the police might not react with the same violence as during Bersih 2.0.
www.guptaghost.com
An instant hit of blueberry that moves quickly into the aromas of the pomegranate and acai. On the palate, the acai hits first, with the blueberry following in a big burst and then finishing with a warm feeling of pomegranate.
Most of the contemporary YA that I do read are of the fun, fluffy variety and You Against Me is anything but. It touches on realistic issues like rape, family loyalty, and friendship. There’s two sides to every story but who is telling the truth and what really happened between Mikey’s sister and Ellie’s brother was the big mystery that had me absorbed and reading till the very end.
For those who are afraid of losing a particularly large, there are so-called risk-free bonuses. Upon receipt of such bonus for party poker rakeback allow the player to a certain fixed amount of money back, even after losing her all the rules. These bonuses are usually valid for a day or two. Free cheese, as is known, lies in a mousetrap, because the amount would have to be repaid several times to play in casinos, although it is still better than losing the money altogether.
She’d been there before, took a beat, listened a moment and quizzically answered Santana? I nodded still somewhere in my memory four decades back in that studio. Then she added, but what about the shoes? As we continued through the Latin Quarter that day we both had a warm glow. She from her prize purchase of her Paris pumps, and me in the memory of when I was part of a moment of musical magic still heard 40 years on. It was a good day on an amazing journey I had taken.
– If the number of minutes is less than a set interval then set the boolean flag to true
He co-authored The Mystery of Life Origin: Reassessing Current Theories and has written 10 book chapters dealing with various faith science issues, a topic on which he speaks widely.
The gang, according to local community police forum members and police sources, is also believed to be responsible for the attack on Neels Kruger and his children during the early hours of Tuesday morning.
And, if I’m having tacos why not make spicy mango margaritas to go with? “
AASRA SPECIAL SCHOOL AND REHABILITAION CENTRE 102/10 Greater Kailash, Jammu is voluntarily working for these noble souls. Due to non funding and non cooperation of government we cannot give them the required facilities
Groundbreaking and Site Dedication: 22 January 1994 by John K. Carmack
What is the weirdest dare you ever accepted?
Dominating the picture is the brake caliper. This is supplied by AP Racing and will be designed around Force India requirements, albeit based on their current iteration of an F1 Caliper.
Size: 2 x 0.10 oz
The only thing I need to improve (well, it’s definitely not the ONLY thing, but it’s at the top of my list) is making more time for my friends. Maybe when I get settled into the job a little more and get into a groove I’ll be able to start planning my social life a little more.
because this chick didn't bust out her camera.
She counted the steps in her head as she descended; thirty not including the landings. Counting helped her forget she held her breath as she went down the steps. She exhaled when she got to the front door.
Just before you wake up,
175 2. Introduction of Malcolm P. Sharp, for “Gambling on Amity.” Bulletin of the Atomic Scientists, May 1, 1981, p. 1. (Preferred title: “The Universe Has Its Good and Friendly Features.”)
not going to lie; I loved all of those fancy dates, but I loved it even more when we began to get more comfortable with just hanging out and watching a movie, going for a walk, or meeting up over our lunch hour downtown to catch up and people watch.
Now, I am not saying that doing everything God’s Word commands will always bring immediate ease and comfort in life, but In this instance it calmed the beast. The one in me and the one in the other person.
He also admitted that not all laws were good laws, but leaders and lawmakers should push for changes in Parliament and not on the streets. However, the 78-year-old pointed out that this was his personal opinion which he had raised with his DAP colleagues.
In southwestern Tennessee, the Union Army under Major-General Ulysses S. Grant had found his command camped at Pittsburg Landing, on the west bank of the Tennessee River. Confederate General Albert Sidney Johnston wanted to launch surprise attack on Grant‘s forces and destroy it. Johnston’s second-in-command, Pierre G. T. Beauregardadvised against such an attack, fearing that the sounds of Confederate soldiers marching and test-firing their rifles after two days of rain had cost them the element of surprise. Johnston refused to accept Beauregard’s advice and told him that he would “attack them if they were a million”. Despite General Beauregard’s well-founded concern, the Union forces did not hear the sounds of the marching army in its approach and remained blissfully unaware of the enemy camped three miles away.
6. Arizona SB1070: “Police Officers are doing racial profiling. I am a poor guy. I don’t have money to hire a lawyer. Drugs were planted in my brother’s truck. He had a permanent green card but didn’t have enough money to hire a lawyer so he was deported back to India. Now I have no trust for the law.” -Demming, NM—Truck Terminal
If this post brought a smile to your day, please SHARE it and help spread the word to everyone on the planet about Super Earthling. Thanks!
356Glance on the stone where our cold relics lie,
The Welsh Audit Office described the management as 'ineffective'.
Bake uncovered in oven for 14- 16 minutes until just firm to touch. Remove from oven and lightly tent with foil for a few minutes.
Always carry the pictures, take me back to right before
So today is day 11 of the reset and I actually have more days behind me than ahead of me which is AWESOME. This is the longest I’ve stuck with something so restrictive…really glad I’m doing this with Diana and really glad I’m doing this in general. The food has really been good. There have only been a few things that I haven’t liked or haven’t wanted to try and I’ve been full basically the whole time. Except yesterday. Yesterday I was hungry ALL. DAY. LONG.
That’s all known.
The credo of Egyptian’s Muslim Brotherhood states as follows “Allah is our objective; the Quran is our constitution, the Prophet is our leader; Jihad is our way; and death for the sake of Allah is the highest of our aspirations.” Now, what part of that is secular? I would surely like to be enlightened on this. Obviously, Mr. Clapper is either an idiot or something else is going on here. With his past gaffe on missing England’s terror arrest one could likely assume he is an idiot but that most likely is just wishful thinking. Something else is at play here.
Stay tuned to see what's in store for Sweet B's.
Hope everyone enjoys checking out this set because there's much more to come!
True Confession (US…Wesley Ruggles)
"What's this shit?" said Maud to Kate,
By overlapping all four of the elementals, you get a hexagram. The Hexagram is also known as the Star of David in Judaism but it is also used in magic.
But my favourite is The Bible Word-Book: A Glossary of Archaic Words and Phrases in the Authorised Version of the Bible and Book of Common Prayer, by William Aldis Wright, first published in 1866 and reissued in a new edition in 1884. Wright (1831–1914), until now better know to us as the co-editor of the Cambridge Shakespeare, was first Librarian and then Bursar of Trinity College, Cambridge, and was Secretary to the Old Testament Company of the English Committee for the Revised Version. Wright’s intention was ‘to explain and illustrate all such words, phrases, and constructions, in the Authorised Version of the Old and New Testaments and the Apocrypha, and in the Book of Common Prayer, as are either obsolete or archaic’. (This covers a great deal of ground, especially the ‘constructions’ – the first word glossed is ‘a, an’, in such contexts as ‘an hammer’, ‘an half’, ‘a-dying’, ‘a-cold’. The last word is ‘yourselves’, used in the nominative.)
So what is “The Rapture” and its significance to the Abomination of Desolation?
So what about these new guidelines? Well, I'm not too impressed. They talk a lot about parking - presumably from the point of view that the more parking there is at transit stations the better, but it's actually ambiguous.
One thing about Al Sharpton, he has a record of championing the side that turns out NOT to have all the facts and truth. He's a demagogue, but what chance would he have of making money if he couldn't keep people feeling the hate? If his way had prevailed, in more than one case, innocent people would be doing time, and some would be dead. Oh, I forgot, I think some people have been killed due to his instigation and playing on blind hatred. Jesse makes his bread off of the same sort of thing. It is shameless and dangerous. Certainly no benefit to any group. I won't even address the implications of the latest case. Or the fact that he keeps leaving out that the hunted witch of the day is another minority.
I’m not sure there’s such a thing as a charmed life. Insofar as my universe spanning powers of perception allow me to peek past the veil, it seems to me the ledger is usually balanced. This might have to do with thermodynamics, or it might have to do with man’s eternal fear of audits. Eventually, inevitably, deposits must equal debits. I try not to think of it as a zero sum game because that would be depressing. A physical manifestation of QuickBooks would also be depressing but for entirely different reasons.
I stitched the majority of this sampler while we were watching the second season of Rome, which is another reason I'm drawing that connection I'm sure. She was a sweet stitch and I enjoyed this sampler immensely.
64-65 Prussia Street in Dublin7 (central Dublin) with 14 apartments and four commercial units is the most expensive property on offer and has a max reserve of €850.000 and is presently generating €111,720 in rent.
that his mere presence can bring
Only ghosts patrol.
Only a few short weeks away from our long-awaited Tuscan retreat—we hope everyone is as excited as we are.
As I cry out my tears,
For now, with the tight schedule crunch of graduation approaching, there are a few other gift ideas that I could do. I would like to give everyone that I know a gift from either this place, or a personalized one, but we’ll just have to see how well finals go. Wish me luck!
across an Elysian scarp
Do you have any shows or books that you wish would never ever end?
Cinnamon Basil 4.26.12
I fell in love with this little floral pillow. I think it was the roses that got to me. Also anytime I find a pillow case with a lace edge it is mine. I will do some embroidery on it, as you know nothing can stay just plain around me.
In terms of gaming, the male hero of the tales, Corin, has a patron in the form of the gnome that raised his half elf employer, Lhasha Moonsilver. This allows him access to goods that he might not normally be able to have access to. This also works out well in a city based campaign because many of the enemies a player may have to face in a city based campaign are human or humanoid and those huge cash reserves that players may be used to stumbling over in a dungeon probably won't be found here.
In their massacre.
The papers are from My Mind's Eye 2009 & 2011 Christmas collections. I painted around the edges with Distress crackle paint and added Snow-Tex for some texture on my main panel. To create some interest, I placed my stamped image on three different layers: a 6" doilie, distressed pattern paper and a piece of corrugated cardboard. This corrugated cardboard was inked using Vintage Photo Distress Ink and then decorated with Cinnamon Stickles.
TM: I think there’s a lot of folks who missed my CSM6 campaign last year. I make no bones about being a complete bastard. Most people who know me in nullsec or have been on the wrong end of my alliance are entirely aware of the lengths I go to in order to win.
for him underneath.
45. Vanilla Cupcakes: I saw this recipe over on Glorious Treats and knew I had to give it a go. It was very simple (and I even used her milk/lemon juice trick instead of the buttermilk). I iced them with her vanilla cream cheese frosting, but I thought it kind of overpowered the vanilla cupcake. I think when I make these again, I’ll try my favorite vanilla buttercream instead. Even still…it’s a cupcake…how can you go wrong?
After an hour of this, the exasperated doctor asked the lawyer, “What do you do to stop people from asking you for legal advice when you’re out of the office?”
I typically apply 3-4 little coats each on the top and bottom lashes (if that makes sense!) but you can add more mascara for a more vamped up look and still not get any clumping – check out the pictures below!
Wash your brushes every two months with liquid anti-bacterial hand – or dishwasher soap. I found that pretending I was using them to paint my hand in a swirling motion really loosened up the dirt and old makeup, and before you know it…you are standing mouth wide opened thinking how the hell all of that just came from this brush! When you are done let them air dry. In the morning you can poof them full again with the blow dryer.
A great big double decker with a bad tempered driver.
This “plague of positivity” where people are declaring that marking your X for this reason is “good,” but for marking your X for this reason is “bad,” just goes too far. And making people feel bad about being non-partisan doesn’t make any sense.
Two ignorant white suburban girls go on a diatribe about how everyone at their high school is black, how they have real hair and black girls have weaves, and how the white people at their school speak like black people (while they do imitations). The girls appear to be about 14 or 15 and clearly have no clue what sort of negative impact their statements are going to have.
Now I’m gonna kiss you now
Harrison Ford’s performance as Richard Walker is one of his absolute best. When you compare it to his other performances in that decade—for Steven Spielberg in Raiders of the Lost Ark (1981); for Ridley Scott in Blade Runner (1982); for Peter Weir in Witness (1985) and The Mosquito Coast (1986)—it seems pretty much a given that the 1980’s was Ford’s finest hour as an actor. Study the natural discomfort in his facial expressions. Look at how exhausted he is when he runs up flights of stairs. Or when he grows impatient with the heads of American Services, grabs the head Embassy Official (John Mahoney) by the arm and demonstrates the possible conditions of his wife’s kidnapping. “You know what it means to me, ‘he had his arm around her’!??" he rages. "Here, like this! He could have had a gun—like this! Here, pointed right at her! ‘Shut up, smile, walk up the lobby!’ Huh? Like this! Huh?” Ford’s performance is a marvelous demonstration of the fatigues of jet lag, and we’re consistently amazed that the actor is able to make it from one set piece to the next.
The founding fathers knew that the world was going to change and that the Constitution needed to be a ‘modifiable’ document to change with the times. It served this purpose pretty well up until the 1930s, and then things started to change faster than the laws and codes of our country could keep up with.
Space Marine battle barge
Hello. I am Betsy Roth. My picture is above. I row every morning before tea. No, not Betsy Ross. ROTH! Betsy Ross has been dead a good ten years. Even in death she steals my thunder, it’s very irritating. I’ve been invited here by Sweet Mother. Below are my thoughts.
This post about Squash and Stretch is more of a conceptual discussion. I talk about this sometimes when I'm giving talks to students, and it's a very important concept in my mind, but I get the feeling that people usually think I'm overstating the case or just crazy. But in my mind this is a big deal.
Probably Nietzsche is right to suggest that priests are, as a rule, historically, ‘weak’, in the sense of not having the right personality or gifts to win power, popularity, and success in an ‘effortless’, ‘natural’ way. But his dyadic vision, where ‘priests and all of the oppressed’ jointly counterpose the blessings of heaven to the pleasures of the world, is too simple. It leaves out the fact that while the oppressed must make do with the eventual blessings of heaven, priests are ‘comforted’ by the abundant pleasures that their power brings them in this life – which they are able to win from their more naively ‘strong’ (oppressive) colleagues, the kings and warlords and knights, on account of their ability to enlist the oppressed and deflect their resentment.
Back in Washington, Obama’s trip drew mixed responses from Senate Republicans.
There has been no whisky distilling at Shinshu since 1992 but Kawaida san at Hombo's head office confirmed to me in July 2010 that the company was refurbishing its still room and planned to start distillation again in 2011 . There are two stills (one of which, according to Katatomo-san, was unsafe in early 2010). The whisky is matured in sherry, brandy and bourbon casks. Mogi says there were about 500 casks in the warehouse in 2008.
Michael Hervey – Death Of A Professor
However after I talk with my therapist on my own I feel so great. This week he told me that he wished all his patients could have the perspective I have and that I am doing a real good job. It felt so great to have him say that. There are some days when I don't think I am tackling this at all well. There are days when doubt creeps in. I have to remind myself to take it all day by day and stay in the here and now.
One reason I looked into Green Pastures was because @caraferguson had it pegged as a "to eat" restaurant. I was intrigued by the tempura lobster tail at first glance, but after a careful look, I noticed that the chef likes to cook with alcohol. The decision to try Green Pastures was easy.
I made this page using Tiny Baker Tia, I just loove her she is so cute and from Some Odd Girl and is available from the M4M Store here. She comes with two sentiments I have used 'just so sweet'.
By breaking the silence
* What inspired you to write A Hen in the Wardrobe? I wondered if any real life incidents had helped inspire your delightful story?
“For the well-off in this country,” Obama said in May 2008, “high gas prices are mostly an annoyance, but to most Americans they’re a huge problem, bordering on a crisis.”
Til next time.. Happy Stampin
It is the same LORD God who in Deut. 18:17,19, says:
Being complacent you seem to feel that everything is OK. Not great. Not awesome. Not perfect. Just OK. When you are comfortable I believe you are happy, content, you feel safe with your partner and who you are as a person. You have this innate feeling that nothing could be better than where you are right now. Well that’s what I believe. The danger of course with complacency is the lack of trying. You don’t bother trying to make things better or even to maintain your relationship, because in all honesty, you have given up. You don’t really care what happens. This is what I feel happened with A and I. I remember telling AB every time he asked how things were and I would say…OK. It had been OK for a very long time. I’m sure A felt the same way too.
-Heart shaped escort cards
Elderly woman kept in police cells after ‘slapping’ officer
My blogging friends' soon to be released novels
What to do as a consumer? It is really quite simple. Stop buying beer out of season, and stop encouraging the trend. You may start to see more beers that make sense in the season. Or during today’s snow storm, sit
It is fitting that all three kinds of smoking tobacco involve the use of fire, for each relates to the soul’s responsiveness to reason, and fire, at least from the days of Prometheus, is especially emblematic of reason. But there are also nonhuman parts to the human soul. The growth of our hair and fingernails, for example, is due to the soul’s activity, yet is not responsive to rational instruction.
This is always the window into the formless. As you accept it, surrender. Because the form is gone, your mind becomes still when you surrender to death. It’s not through explanations that you accept death. You can have explanations, mental explanations that say, well, he or she will move on or reincarnate, or go to some place of rest. That can be comforting, but you can go to a deeper place than that, where you don’t need explanations – a state of immediate realization of the sacredness of death, because what opens up when the form dissolves is life beyond form. That is the only thing that is sacred. That is the sacred dimension.
Beep.. Beep.. Booop.. Beeep.. Beep..
(This Level requires two tiers)
So, if you focus on the things you find difficult today, chances are your brain will rehearse them when you go to sleep tonight. Isn't that fantastic?
My mother-in-law is quite literally on her death bed.
We missed Wakefield’s annual Rhubarb Festival by just a few days, but that didn’t stop us finding great places for coffee and tea or discovering that the man who wrote ‘The Lambeth Walk’ used to sing in the cathedral choir as a teenager. Ah, the tidbits of information you find out through FancyaCuppa!
We have laughed for years, before we even knew what a “sister wife” was, that if we could just share our work it would be so much easier. I like to cook the savory dishes and she likes desserts. I like to play in the dirt and she likes to clean dirt. I like to wash and she likes to iron, well we don’t “like” to but someone has to do it. She does the homework help and I do the shopping, (mostly because I didn’t do homework when I was a kid and I’m not starting now.) If we could work it out with separate houses and husbands and beds and it would be _____ amazing!
I was doing so well with slowly trading flab for what resembled toned muscle and then I got a new job that consists mostly of me sitting in an office chair, typing legal documents and talking to clients all day. While on one hand, yay much better job, it sucks that I’m no longer on my feet all day, walking around and using muscles I forgot existed. Simply put, no work out built into the job. Which means I’m going to have to actually put in the effort to make a change in myself.
Supervisors: Alex Strazzanti, MSW and Kacey Jeniene Kroeger, CNP – Co-Founders / Co-Presidents
Periodically I have been asked for my clinical opinion on a potential neurological condition afflicting someone. It's not often, but I have been asked about such diverse things as stroke, Creutzfeldt–Jakob, and Parkinson's. While I might be able to give some insight, for example I did correctly recognize the beginning signs of Parkinson's in one person, I do not offer it for one very good reason: I am not a clinician. My advice is always to go see one.
To endeavour to seek reasons for Africa's inability to adapt to the demands of the modern world would, like it or not, also have to include examining the nature side of the Nature vs. Nurture dichotomy - something that must be avoided at all costs, lest a pale male wants to stand accused of being a Nazi, a baby seal clubber, a pedophile and an uprooter of saplings. Be that as it may; the PC excuse to always blame black failure on white prejudice (i.e. the Western-dominated current global environment) has lost all credibility.
This hop-back, which is an intermediate handsome copper vessel, 40 feet long and 18 feet wide, possesses a false bottom constructed of gun metal. The wort here gradually drains itself from the hops with which it has been mixed in the coppers, and is pumped to the coolers. In this department, each man has a cabin, wherein he exchanges his ordinary costume for a suit of white flannels, supplied by the firm, and which are washed out at the end of every days work (so particular are they as to cleanliness, etc.) On leaving this gallery or stage we descended to the ground floor, underneath the copper hearth, where there are four large hop-presses, and several smaller ones for extracting the wort from the spent hops, and two sets of three-throw brass pumps, which deliver the wort direct on to the coolers, fixed on the top of the next building. Also, under the mashing room, there are two engines for driving machinery, three sets of three-throw pumps, four ice engines and a set of three-throw pumps for hot water, all to be described hereafter.
* If one's PC became aware that they (alone?) had shifted, but nothing was profoundly different, would that affect the play-quality of that and the other player/s?
Although I have an amazing group of friends, and that handful that would even come pick me up if I was stranded on a road, I have one friend who deserve a particular merit award.
Thank you ever so much!
The example I brought had nothing what so ever to do with that specific individual – he was not the one I was referring to at all! True a while back there was a similar issue with that individual and it was taken care of, however I was talking about a second person who repeated the same incident and I was trying to bring home a point of how harmful it was. Yet the first individual was utterly convinced that I was referring to him directly and that I was bashing him. This to me is very funny, yet sad at the same time. Had that individual come to me directly, I would have explained that to him, yet he chose to victimize himself and build this whole tower of misery around him. This is the point where I back off. I rather be happy than right. I did not try to “win” the debate, I was simply trying to drive a point, now that it is being blown out of proportion – this is the part where I back off.
“Here’s a tip for you, young man. Have a care whose home you enter,” said Jowly.
I’m really looking forward to the Olympic year, with the Trials and the Games and all the other meets. But there are some things I want to ask for, that would really make the year great.
Somehow, I had lost my way, and became disillusioned, -I suppose it was the growing realisation that there would always be people who balked at paying a fair price for a hand-made piece, yet would pay significant money for mass-produced stuff, bashed out by a machine, by the thousand.
eating good food and sharing the moment.
If you've read this far well done, you might be serious about doing something wonderful for yourself ;)
Taking a trip to the dessert does sound pretty straight forwards and for this simple reason many people burry their cars in the dunes, have accidents or simply wreck their cars.
*i misunderstood the meaning of keyboard hero and has thus removed the usage altogether. my bad.
Happy Sunday everyone! But for those who are on the same side of the globe with me, Sunday is almost over, and I should really say Happy Monday instead ;)
Hi to you all from my wet and miserable corner of Kent. I know we really need the rain, but I do wish it would give us a few days off....really need to cut my grass and i've got trays of viola's I want to get bedded in. Ho, hum, so I cant get green fingers today, I guess i'll just have to stop in and craft instead!!
the grocery store to pick up the ingredients for this recipe
it has stuck with you?
my heart is my treasure,
Limit my time on Pinterest.
Again i think the quality is not the best ive used, but they are fairly good, with the band abit stiff, but nothing too much to handle. these 2 a shorter, but good for a everyday look if you wanna pump up your lash volume a bit, quite natural actually. So i was sent ES A88 and ES A89. Again I wanna thank kkcenterhk, for sending me these Falsies.
b.The Rocket Ride
I won't be going home straight after birth and I do remember the
May your heart always be joyful
Last but by no means least to have the decorative treatment was Great Great uncle Richard. His cast has been in the family for over two hundred and fifty years now and it never ceases to inspire Lady Grantham. Uncle Richard ran a very respectable boys school for over thirty years as well as being the local Mayor. An amazing horseman and exceedingly well read, he really was a man of wonder!
I’m not going to drive myself insane, repeating in my head something that happened. More so, something I have no power to change the outcome to. I will not tell myself I am a certain way because of an experience. Neither will I dwell on the past. Or on someone else’s reaction. It was a moment. It passed. What is here now, has NOTHING to do with it.
“It really feels good to see my daughter improve but her mental status continues to worry me. She still cannot talk, rarely response to orders, cannot do anything constructive and always looked disturbed that’s why I still tie her whenever am living her alone home,” Grace Akumu said.
Much kneeling–hands up at Zoo.
~The other change I've lived in to is being "in charge." They did tell us in seminary that being rector meant worrying about buildings and money as much as (or more than) anything else, and it's true. This year has been full of those issues: we lost five out of nine air conditioning units, and two out of three boilers in the last five months. Our budget deficit is so big it's sort of like thinking about the national debt (proportionately). Negativity is rampant. Of course there is much to love about what I do, and I'm glad to be here. But sometimes it is hard not to get sucked into that black hole of despair about how in the world things are going to work out.
The album starts out with Nine Inch Nails covering "Zoo Station," which is surprising on several levels. One, I thought Trent Reznor was done with NIN. I guess not? Second, I thought he didn't like U2, although I guess if he liked any of their albums, it would be this one (when it came out, I thought it sounded like U2 were influenced by NIN's debut, 1989's Pretty Hate Machine). Third, NIN's versions is so different. It's much more subtle, and a bit creepier than U2's.
April 21-28 is National Infant Immunization Week and the Latin Chamber of Commerce would like to remind parents to get their infants vaccinated. Why? Because each year children die from easily-preventable diseases such as pertussis (whooping cough) or pneumonia.
During the years of the Republic, legions were created and disbanded as needed. This is how the Celts could sack Rome in 353 BC--the Romans had to hastily assemble a defensive force that was ill-trained and ill-prepared to face the onslaught of bands of wild savages from the north. It wasn't until the time of a fellow named Marius that anyone thought to create permanent, standing armies to serve the Roman Republic (this was late in the second century, BC).
lady + es = ladies
BF: So there you go. The Bilderbergers were chased out, with their tails between their legs.
Princes and knights in shining armour fighting evil stepmothers and other bad guys...
The video is also to find a Creabest Blog.
my hopes are just wasting away
A very complex malt palate (the brewery lists 2-row, Vienna, Carapils, Wheat, Caramel malts in the grain bill) is supported by a very assertive but absolutely clean bittering. Citrus and pine notes prevail on the nose and the palate. An outstanding American IPA (India Pale Ale).
Plastic makes me anxious. Rightly, it would seem, because it pollutes and won’t break down and causes sexual confusion in animals and causes cancer. It’s the sort of anxiety about the earth and my children’s future that turns quickly to paralysis. The characters in Scott Fotheringham’s novel The Rest is Silence are not paralysed, though, and do act in the face of environmental destruction.
I visit LinkedIn almost every day and I enjoy seeing what my contacts are up to. I loatheloatheloathe one woman who “updates” there every 13 seconds with work tips to make sure we do not waste even a single hour forgetting who she is. I know, I know, I can’t email her and say “Enough! Stop! You are boring and overbearing and horrible.”
Answer: There are nestled in a blue tarp, one on top of the other all higgledy piggledy inside the wheelbarrow. No fence to keep out bunnies and moose. No safe ground (we have some drainage issues and need to do some re-grading). At this point, I’m thinking a few bags of compost inside the abandoned dog run, heel in, water, and call it good. Or maybe I’ll search for “place to plant perennials when there is no place to plant” and land on one of your blogs….
I was searching for cute cats in “Instagram” and I found the most adorable thing/pet/cat (aside from my Kuning ofcourse!) that ever walked this earth! – the name is Snoopybabe. It’s breed according to the owner is “Exotic Shorthair” and from what I can see, is one pampered cat since it (or he) has it’s own Instagram account!
Monica sent me an email the other day. I am definitely over her now. Once again the world has been gifted with a seriously psychotic shrink.
But resting with your flesh and bones
“You’re late, damn it!”
The rise of the Far Right is to be explained, not in the needs of the Capitalist Class, but in the fears of the working class, the small capitalists, and middle classes. In Europe all these forces find themselves in uncharted territory. The old certainties have gone. Europe, and even North America are no longer the centre of the world. Instead, power has shifted rapidly, and decisively Eastward. A lage part of the crisis in the European periphery is to be explained by this shift, as any attempt to earn a living, around industries that can be located anywhere, and depend upon relatively low paid, unskilled labour is increasingly futile, as it is impossible to compete in these areas with China, and even cheaper labour economies in Vietnam etc. The era of cheap money, and credit that ran from the late 1980's only acted to disguise this reality, and now, after the Financial Crisis, not only has that reality been shattered, but the costs of the pipe dream it entailed now have to be paid.
Johnson is a computer guy, so he dedicated more of this book to software and computer networks than to the other subjects, which for the mostpart went over my head (and I’m not short). Nevertheless, the introductory chapters were an excellent introduction to the subject, and worth checking out if you’re interested.
So what are The Manxx putting on the A-Side? "Messin' around" has got a booming kick drum going at a real frantic pace with simultaneous tambourine smacks... reminiscent of Frankie Rose, without so much attack with the toms. Sara on guitar and vocals is way up front in the mix, all kinds of clean treble distorted with winky attitude. This undertow of organ and her energetic delivery has the whole track going a little bit cutsey...something like the pop beatings of Bratmobile or Bunnygrunt, with punk spikes...this three piece has a jumpy jangle guitar with a spazz garage edge to the whole thing.
We have some new badges for you to snag as well...these wonderful badges were created by the ever so talented Helene(2amscrapper).
Ambassador John Bolton remarked that:
It's yet another example of how education invents ways in which children should be deprived of art's way of thinking about us as human beings, reflectively, contemplatively, speculatively, imaginatively, symbolically and, above all, through narrative or 'story'.
Needless to say it was music to my ears when he said, You're Right! Win, Win!!!
Who may submit photos?: INPS members or their immediate family members are eligible to submit photos – A maximum of 5 photos per individual please. (entry form)
- "O for Orange" -
Those milestone birthdays are so good for giving us an excuse to spoil ourselves. Bring on 50, baby.
Burton and DeeDee McMurtry
Today, Ana has been nice enough to share glimpses into some of the beautiful rooms from her office, home, and beach house. The photo above is the waiting area and reception desk (left) of her showroom and office in Lisbon. I adore the black piping on the sofa and the large, off-center sunburst mirror. I don't know about you, but I could wait forever in a reception area this beautiful!
and finds his famine at my breasts.
Would I recommend? Definitely. The Forgotten Garden is beautifully written, a compelling mystery, a misty grown-up fairy tale, and quite a satisfying read.
sunglasses as a headband
However, I hope many of you will be upset at the latest proposition by Datuk Raja Nong Chik. If you are, please raise your concerns to your elected representative and petition DBKL against the move. You can also help by sending this link to your friends.
Due to popular demand (yeah, that means you, Russ), and the fact I did say I'd come back to this, I suppose I'd better pop up some notes on a beer that used to be my regular tipple every time I visited the local dive bar* in my wife's home town: Schwaben Bräu Das Schwarze. Beautiful looking, isn't it? But how does it taste?
We would like to see your projects with flowers in them... they could be stamped flowers, flower buttons, flower embellishments... any kind of flowers... go wild! Of course if you use a Little Miss Muffet Stamps image though then you can submit a project using the theme Anything Goes. It's always fun to see how you are using Little Miss Muffet images!
The holidays and the twenty first birthday celebrations are now over and my princess has left to start a new term at university, but when I enter her bedroom I can still detect the sweet lingering notes of her presence. This perfume is gentle and soft, sweet but not cloying and the merest hint makes me think of her.
Today we have found a car, via le Bon Coin, we had a look at a couple of cars but one really took our fancy, we also had to deal with a new guy in the bank as our lovely Mme Sourire has since left but jeune Mr Huile is not too bad… shame he doesn’t speak English!
Favorite Non-Alcoholic Drink: Well that’s easy…COFFEE! Isn’t it everybody’s? Just Kidding!
Next, BBQ shrimp. No photo cuz we both ate it too quickly. Did I mention that it was wrapped in bacon? Double yum.
% mv science.bak backups/.
Anyone who in the pursuit of truth chooses to become a prime target of lefto-lunatic money scammers like Southern Poverty Law Center has my respect. But I am dismayed that MacDonald, an academic who ought to know better, has constructed a revealing if partisan typology and then treated it as though it’s an explanatory taxonomy.
For those who are concerned about who's doing what - I'm going to list in the comments on this post the ones that have been completed. I will comment with ONLY the ones that I have received an actual image for. If you want to state what you intend to draw, then by all means comment publicly for everyone to see! There's no reason to squabble over who's doing what, or not draw something since someone else is doing it. There's such a thing as sequels or alternate console versions if you would like to make yours truly unique.
One of the many dilemmas facing those who support liberal democratic ideals is the ever-present friction between vote-centric politicians on the one hand, and the independent crime and justice arms of the State on the other.
The most viewed posts are not necessarily those with the most comments. Comments come from regular readers, or readers with a deep interest; post hits come mostly from people who are just skimming the internet.
I won Connie's (Cabin Fever Primitives) giveaway on June 29th and received my package today! I never expected it would arrive so quickly with 2 holidays in there! I have to tell you it was really like Christmas in July for not only me, but for Shelby and Hailie as well. They love opening up mail that I get and when we saw how beautifully wrapped everything was they of course wanted to help :)
Retirement should be a time where you get to experience everything you didn’t have time to do while you were working; therefore, it is never too early to start planning and taking action. Once you formulate your plan with the help of the best retirement planning software, don’t delay; take caution today, and you will be well on your way to achieving the retirement of your dreams.
Do you ever read Primary source documents?
The slideshow at the top is My Wall of Insiration–artified! Taken today, the first photography all week!
So like all good projects, we put out a sign for everyone to see what’s in progress. Kinda like, “future site of the Hallmark Plaza Center” or “Barnes and Noble coming to your neighborhood!” or something like that. But it’s ad hoc, and who knows how long we’ll keep it. It’ll do for now. But when we do finally settle on a name, whatever we wanna call this new project, we take time in choosing it. Now I don’t know about you, but my parents took an awful lot of time and care in choosing my old name. And while I loathe hearing it, I appreciated the sentiment, and thus have taken equal care in choosing a new name or, rather, names. I changed all of them, actually. Didn’t even keep the family name.
Place in center of each rectangle:
Always assume the best first. There could be a real good reason for the thing you are frustrated about. Get the whole picture before you make any judgements.
There are two stages of disinfection. Primary disinfection and secondary. Primary disinfection is the procedure to make the water safe to drink, and secondary disinfection is done to keep water safe for storage or distribution.
2. Let them know that you nominated them.
Why you ask? The story is actually quite tragic. We are remembering the infamous Battle of Acosta Ñu. In 1869 the war had already taken its toll on Paraguay the dictator Francisco Lopez needed younger and younger recruits for the his army, this particular battalion was made up of 3,500 children ages six to fifteen. Although the war was essentially over the Brazilian government wanted Lopez captured and on August 16th, 20,000 thousand men from Brazil's army obliterated the small Paraguayan battalion made up of mostly children.
At what point does action reject a tendency or inclination?
There is so much I can say about Tina but I think I’ll just go on and sit with my coffee and think about my girl.
1 John 3:1 “How great is the love the Father has lavished on us, that we should be called children of God! And that is what we are!” (NIV)
Thanks to Facebook, I was in contact with a high school friend who lives in a suburb of Philadelphia and is married to a lovely man who knows the streets of Philadelphia like the back of his hand. She offered her home, her upstairs office lined with books on all walls (as she is an English professor), picked me up from the airport with one of her adorable boys and her twin sister–who just happened to not be out of the country at the time like she usually is.
Publisher Audio CD: Brillance Audio
3. Anyone who had a short term association or arms length employee relationship
I basically cleared out all my backlog at work. Quite the accomplishment.
The multinational ARLA by the way, has been long criticized and boycotted in Denmark because of their abuse of their dominant market position, to try and eradicate smaller and often more ecologically minded dairies and small farmers in Denmark.
@DarrenGoldsmith
Part deux: Happiness - it's not just a city in China!
(poem removed)
That goes back to the beginning of today’s entry, going with my gut feeling as to which direction to go, which path to take when, and those types of things. If I had gone the other way around today and not walked a path that I normally don’t, I may have missed the two turkeys gobbling at the exact same time, the geese mating, the grebe watching them, and Father Goose warding off another gander. Is that all just pure dumb luck? I’d like to think that it wasn’t, but who knows for sure.
In the days following Abby’s death, her best friend told police he’d learned Abby was taking part in the game — “If we hadn’t found out what she’d been doing, we’d have thought she committed suicide,” Kassi said — and tried to talk her out of it.
with honey, salt and decay.
and, as I acquire mind I begin to recognize those people who become, for me, my
Movement Building
I hear her wash her hands and the conversation turns more bizarre. "Did the clown ever show up?"
Everybody welcome, of course it’s free!
Have you ever noticed that Joan NEVER talks about anything positive in her life? It’s ALWAYS negative, she NEVER has anything nice to say about anything. She has no life. She has no SPIRITUAL life. She NEVER says thank you for anything in her life…because she is ALWAYS angry, resentful and pissed off because she is an ADOPTEE. And because she can’t stand that other family members would have a different view from her she has spend her entire life bitching and screaming and bullying and harassing a DEAD HORSE. She IS adopted but because she has never accepted that she keeps beating the dead horse and of course she is miserable and can’t stand to hear that other people are not as miserable as she is and she makes it all up to say that we are miserable.
30gr flaked almonds
Take a guess at what those colors of flosses will be used for in
And I didn't forget about our little men either! I love this tie applique. It is so rockin'. Dressed up style without the dressed up discomfort. So what better way to show some team pride then with this charming shirt.
Over the years the newspaper won the Pulitzer Prize four times, once for exposing corruption in the police department during the administration of Mayor William O’Dwyer.
Later on he transferred to his old county regiment, which was the Loyal North Lancs, and met my mother and married in 1917. I wasn't born until 1928. He didn't go back to farming, not until much later, although he always wanted to. He became an accountant in, I think, the Calcutta Electric Supply Corporation. He was what I think they called in India at the time a "boxwallah"; that is, he wasn't a soldier or a diplomat, he was a businessman. He eventually came home in 1940. My mother died prematurely, so I was brought up by an aunt.
Yes, he is righteous and worthy, but it’s Christ’s righteousness and worthiness that makes him so (“I will cry unto thee, my God, the rock of my righteousness”). Here Nephi is reminding us that even those of us who have chosen to walk with God, have dedicated our lives to Him and have even made enormous sacrifices to do so, need Him desperately. How beautiful that even after a lifetime of service and spectacular manifestations from heaven, Nephi is STILL struggling, STILL weak, STILL sinful, STILL angry.
The night before last, after he had made the big deal about the dishes not being washed, after we got into bed, he wanted to read the Love Languages book to me. Actually, only part of it. I had already started reading it, since I was the one who brought it home and since he had been nagging me to read it. So he started reading out loud where I had stopped reading.
Speaking of dogs...dog owners, please pick up your dog's shit. It takes less than a minute to grab a few plastic bags on your way out, and less than that to pick up the poop itself. I know, it's one of the most awful tasks a person can do, picking up a hot, slimy pile of feces, but for the love of God. Just do it. And please toss the bag of poo in a garbage can. I simply cannot understand how someone will go to the trouble of picking up the crap, tying the bag securely, and then dumping said tied bag on the sidewalk. Really?
While these baroque fantasies make entertaining cinema (cf. THE STING, THE USUAL SUSPECTS, NINE QUEENS), in reality they are impossible … and unnecessary.
this letter, the Holy Father discusses some of the history and importance of praying the Rosary. He examines in-depth how the through a Rosary, when properly prayed, Mary systematically draws us into the heart of her Son; and then he teaches us how to properly pray a Rosary, practically bead by bead.
THIS BLOG!! Poor Siobhan, first she encourages me, then she has to come to my rescue! She's pretty smart, and thankfully, a sweet friend :) Otherwise, this blog would be toast.
none of it is black and white.
So I think I'm going to get rid of my Home Management Binder, perhaps I really just don't have as much paper clutter as I thought! (Which of course is a GREAT thing) so one less thing of clutter and one step closer to seeing how my day to day life can affect my 'needs' in terms of organization even! My command center IS my Home Managment Binder I'm happy to report! :)
Here is a two page layout I did using American Craft's Daydreams. I love the bright colors as well as the embellishments that go along with this line. My favorite is the pre-made rosettes!
Anyway, where I have been the past few days? Working away on the layout for my little Annabelle. No pictures, as yet. I want to have a little bit more put together first. ;)
Dance Performances by:
A while ago I decided to make at least five people feel amazing everyday. Not necessarily a friend or even a person I know. A lot of times I find someone on tumblr and just message them saying how beautiful they are because most of them don’t realize how awesome they really are.
What are my thoughts?
4- My Sister Pantry http://mysisterspantry.wordpress.com/ These two sister’s are on a real food journey. They have great ideas and share a lot of humor along the way. Always something interesting to be had!
I try to convince my husband to move us near the beach, just about every day.
So-called little things – tooth brushing, face washing, sock seams, clothing in general, hair (washing/cutting/brushing), food too hot/cold, take on nightmarish proportions and lead to catastrophic meltdowns. Shirts ‘hurt’ him. A new winter jacket is a complete issue unto itself. (See Mr. Sensitive vs. His New Winter Coat)
Humbly at His feet I bow,
The stock Intel cooler is noisy as heck, so lets invest on a nice cooler. The Cooler Master’s Hyper TX3 is a great budget oriented HSF, and it does the job really well. Another great thing about using one is, you can squeeze more juice out of your Intel Core i3-2120 by means of over-clocking. Nice.
Ah, kids parties. There are some among us who are natural born party planners, who relish the yearly ritual of identifying an original theme, crafting inspiring decorations, decorating a spectacular cake, thinking of fun party games - the new twists on old favourites - all designed to surprise and delight the little birthday boy/girl, and his/her little guests. I am not the party planner type, but I admit that I love the creative process of working with a theme, and I'm a sucker for seeing my kids beam when their friends gather around to sing happy birthday...
5. You Can't Judge a Book by the Cover
If anyone wins who reads this, I’m expecting at least 5% of your winnings. Thank you in advance.
On our last night in Macau, we decided to try one of the newly opened restaurant inside the fairly new opened casino-hotel, the Holiday Inn Hotel Macau.
"Nearly 70 people have been named in Greece in connection with an alleged football match-fixing scandal. They include two Super League club presidents, club owners, players, referees and a chief of police. They are charged with a variety of offences including illegal gambling, fraud, extortion and money laundering.
So, the teacher is in the meeting with us, the principal and guidance counselor. Everyone is all lovey-dovey and the teacher will now send letters home every two weeks with student progress (for everyone in the class). I really wanted to give the principal an earful about a problem teacher that is causing problems for me and my family, and the school knew about it for at least one previous year. This is one of the problems we have with the teacher's union and tenure (hopefully soon corrected by Governor Christie - love that guy). I'm still thinking about writing another letter to the principal stating this. Do I want to do the noble thing and try and prevent this from happening to next year's 7th and 8th graders? I'm thinking on it.
The topics covered in the main text include writing your first SOA Suite composite, service-enabling existing systems, using BPEL to build composite services and business processes, adding human workflows and using business rules & events. The text then goes into a worked example via a tutorial that spans multiple chapters and pulls many of the core concepts together using facilities available in the SOA Suite software. Concepts like persistence of data, validation, error-handling, deployment, testing and security are all explored to a basic level of detail.
God…places signs on our path of life…
Actually, I was taking this proud mama moment of a picture of Peyton cooking up some dinner and Preston working on his homework, and then Parker wanted to join in the fun, in typical monkey Parker fashion...
“Jason?”
It turns out I wasn't really veering too far off the path.
I like them both for different reasons. But I guess what they share in common is that heaviness and density that means your belly is going to be nice and bloated, along with a gooey stickiness that I find absolutely irresistible.
#2. make sure people know what it is.
Cutting all the extra verbiage has an added benefit: it drops the word count from 332 to 169. There's a reason good queries should be 250 words or fewer: it forces you to focus on what's important, remove all the extra words, and stop when you've said enough.
At the same time, and despite the challenges they face, there has also been robust growth in investment into Africa from many developed markets. In the period from 2007 to 2011 UK project numbers have been up 27%, with the US and Germany also both increasing by 21%.
These ribs are those kinds of ribs.
The Shine Project is also a source of motivation to push us
Savannah caught the moth in a cup.
3. That all pervasive – fear of failure and the only phenomenon one can learn more over and over again …Don’t be afraid to be afraid!
do this the right way now
I don't know about you, but when I have the chance to eat at a Mexican restaurant, I look forward to the chips and salsa. I probably enjoy the salsas more than the actual meal:). The salsas are so different in texture and flavor. Not one is alike.
When the doors opened, Mark led the way from the elevator to the double doors leading into the ICU. He pushed a button on the wall and explained, “After 9 PM these lock and you have to use the phone there to get permission from the nurse’s station.”
Rome wasn't built in a day and neither is a new set of china, so patience... my patience (how I hate being patient... it must be the total opposite to impetuous) is called for. Over time this porcelain will hopefully become my new collectible... and will take pride of place in our armoire... Did I mention that I have a weakness for white china? xv
Cover the ramekins with buttered foil (important!) and place in a rack inside a roasting pan. Add hot water to the roasting pan until it comes halfway up the sides of the ramekins. Bring the water to a gentle boil then reduce heat to medium high and cover with foil. Steam the puddings for 50 minutes or until a knife inserted into the center comes out clean. At some point you will think, "these are never going to cook!!" Do not despair, they will, although you may need to turn up the heat and or add additional hot water to the pan.
1 overhead
Throughout the investigation, the Scorpio killer knows just the right buttons to push when it comes to the San Francisco Police Department’s most notorious cop. He plays the bureaucrats in City Hall allowing him to not just ask for ransom money twice (the second time after he is able to walk free thanks to Callahan’s abuse of power), but to draw the spotlight on the police department for its archaic police officers refusing to evolve during the era of Miranda and Escobido. This is the most brilliant aspect of Dirty Harry: the film clearly sides -- and wants us to side -- with the idea that revenge is okay when it’s clear that the criminals are guilty; essentially they don’t deserve rights and we need more cops like Callahan that will solve the problem with a .44 Magnum instead of an impartial jury (this theme is explicated in further detail in the great sequel, Magnum Force, where Harry has to come face-to-face with the extreme of what critics had to say about his character in this film). What’s fascinating is that no matter what your belief system is -- politically or morally -- and no matter how aware you are critically that what Callahan does is wrong, you still find yourself rooting for Callahan to get the killer by any means necessary. After all, it’s a film, and it is through film that we project our deepest fears and secrets and exorcise a lot of the things we may not be so keen on letting other people know we feel, or, better, would allow ourselves to feel; in the case of Dirty Harry: violence as a means of justice.
In 1982, Sri Sri entered a ten-day period of silence in Shimoga located in the Indian state of Karnataka. The Sudarshan Kriya, a powerful breathing technique, was born. With time, the Sudarshan Kriya became the center-piece of the Art of Living courses.
Your helpful purchases through those links, generates much appreciated pennies to keep this blog running. Your feedback and support… just way cool, and way appreciated. Thanks!
Yet over the past ten years, the economies of Sweden and Switzerland, which are not members of the eurozone, have grown 2.25 and 1.75 percent respectively, the report states.
shredded cheese and crumbled tortilla chips (if you want to skip making the nachos)
The Buddha is completely innocent when it comes to the question of Christ’s death. Jews have been burdened for centuries with false allegations around this event, and all manner of prejudice and discrimination that flows from that. Neither the Buddha, nor Buddhists, to my knowledge, participated in Crusades, or Inquisitions, or other bloody ways of spreading their faith. Jews also, in many cases, have developed a strong (and justified) “fortress mentality” in the face of centuries of persecution. The fact that the Holocaust was the experience of the older generation of Jews that is still living has undoubtedly created cultural and generational wounds that may take centuries to heal.
the elder iron sky. Yet as I mouthed those words
The guidelines are probably more meant as protective against discrimination lawsuits.
Hadot emphasizes that what the concentration on the present and view from above have in common is that both, in a sense, assume the view of the world which is radically depersonalizing. In the concentration on the present, past and future fall away, and there is bare life, life stripped down radically. But as this awareness brings us into contact with the passing of this present, we inevitably shift to the view from above, which is the world as it looks without us. For Hadot, this is the world viewed from the perspective of our own death. And Hadot is right to emphasize the fact that the Stoic “exercise of death” is lurking within the other two exercises, even if implicitly.
sprouts and remaining soy
It's been made very clear in the media that this officer is Muslim and he doesn't want to be deployed to Iraq. Ok, I get that. I mean, let's see a show of hands....who wants to go to Iraq?
Verbena Bonarienses
Even to kids this movie could seem childish but the scene where Chucky was hiding in the closet and proceeds to hack and stab a teacher to death with a school ruler was enough to have me kicking at dark closets well into my teens and it still gets under my skin.
KOZA NM, MAKAROWA NT, KARNAEVA LP, KOROLEVA EI, FRIZEN VI. Efficacy of a complex program for controlling influenza in a large industrial city. Zh Mikrobiol Epidemiol Immunobiol 1985; 8: 36-38.
- Friday, June 8th: Portland, OR
Alec Goodchilde has everything a man could want—except the freedom to be himself. Once a year, he motors down to an exclusive yacht club on the Cornish coast and takes the summer off from the trap that is his life.
OK, for you and all the people who emailed me about it this week:
AT&T External Affairs Manager Robyn Gruner
I was driving in a residential area..
And bad people scared.
I've loved every moment of this pregnancy so far... but, I think it's time.
Those signs of how He tried to warn us numerous times to look up…. read the signs…but… we CHOSE not to listen…Not to look ….at that all important sign…
I could have stayed there. Once I fail, it’s hard to adorn myself in humility. It’s hard for me to admit my wrongdoings and seek forgiveness. But it’s part of my growing. It’s part of God’s lesson in my life. I turn back to God because He has not removed Himself from me. He is the one that pricked my conscious, that allowed me to see the hurt on my child’s face, that allowed me to feel the guilt of causing that pain. I turn back to God because it was I who turned my back on Him. I turn back to God and I am humbled. He who forgives before I even ask.
You tend to lean towards others for your support, however what when those are not around or you disagree in what they have to say. You ones are on a SELF REFLECTIVE journey for your OWN soul growth and realization.
What could possibly brighten me up on this gray, wet day, I wondered. Then a thought came to mind when my little girl brought me a “flower” she made of a paper napkin.
Barkley
Here are the best, and worst, performing cities as reported by the AP and Trulia. Six out of the top ten are in Florida and none of the bottom ten are in Florida:
www.BDOB.com
Dive - Geist
3. Keep a copy of our backups in two or more locations off-site, one of which should be online with a digital company like Mozy, Carbonite, etc. The second should be housed with a relative or close friend who lives in a different part of the country. You may want to trade with them and keep a copy of their data to reciprocate.
Truly, there were two options to choose from on the menu that day. Grow bitter, resentful and angry or choose to help others through what they experience because of my experience. Bring joy where joy can be brought, care where hearts are hurting, and love where lives are broken.
JCS 2009 Ornament Issue
"I have an internship, which I'm doing remotely," I clarified. "But if they offered me a position I'd take it in a heartbeat."
No bus to catch to school and back.
I had to take Milo out of his carrier and walk through the metal detector with him in my arms (for which he wore a snazzy purple harness and leash, just in case he tried to bolt. And I wore a crummy old sweater since I knew I was going to get cat crud all over). The carrier had to go through the x-ray machine.
A: I don't know. I just mean if, I just...Well, I don't know how I'd feel.... Oh, I don't understand what I mean either.
super heavy, all steel
I loved being around horses, and always wanted to take a ride on one of the work horses. One day Clendon unhitched the team at the woodpile in the back yard. The house sat up on a little hill. The Beaver Valley road to Horsefly went past the front, at the bottom of the little hill. There was a road up to the house on one side, and it carried on back down on the other side., rejoining the “main” road down near the barn.
To my absolute joy, one of the first podcasts to pop up was The Ricky Gervais Show. I can't say everything produced by Gervais makes me fall over in laughter, sometimes his stuff can be really awful (I now make reference to that one off show Derek 'comedy-drama' on Channel 4 not so long ago). However, there are a few things from Gervais which are just pure brilliance - namely An Idiot Abroad starring Karl Pilkington. If you haven't seen An Idiot Abroad then you really are missing out on some fantastic television viewing.
"In consequence, a positive conclusion by the NAO on value for money up to 2008 was not possible."
I went to extremes today but, I wanted to start a new
Butt hidden behind a forest not a jungle
A relationship. With a lover, with an ill relative. And if that relationship fails, or the relative dies, we need to remember that we were not defined purely by that relationship.
Let's start with memory lane....the 'Before' shots.
Oh well, the people who are alleged to have killed the police officer in Glenview are still rotting in prison. The police officers who were seen killing Luxmore, namely; Motion Jakopo (41), Simon Mafunda (32), Michael Makwalo (30), Lee Makope (23), Benedict Tapfuma (22) and Blessing Saidi (26) and injuring 11 other people have been released on $50 bail. Where is the justice in that? Are police officers more important than ordinary civilians, hence making their murder more critical and their alleged criminals guiltier than those who kill ordinary people? Is the known crime of police officers, who clearly ill-treated citizens to whom they owe a constitutional mandate to protect, a less serious offence than that of rowdy citizens who allegedly attacked a police officer?
These guys are masochists. They are begging Arpaio to come give them a hiding and the sheriff from Arizona will be only too happy to oblige. Everybody knows that Obama's DOJ is trying to break Sheriff Arpaio because of his project to expose Obama's ineligibility to the office of the presidency. This vendetta against the Arizona sheriff is an example of the pettiness and misuse of power of a very corrupt government.
In addition, homestay programme participants procured an additional income of RM15.7mil against the RM14mil target set for the year.
2012-03-24 363000
Lord help me, I looked. (And f%#@ me, it was a doozie.)
This month, I am giving my first Music Therapy Improvisation Workshop for HH donations. I’m looking forward to actively earning some designated money (over scavenging for change and scraping from my own earnings.).
2 pieces 2½"x2½ CS scored at ½ all the way around. Cut up and adhere to form base and top.
This is 100% true. Inquisition plays some super-fucking-evil, above-par black metal, but their "hook", as it were, lies deeply in the vocal delivery of guitarist Dagon. His nasal, monotone croaking is equal parts narration and singing, and I can't help but picture him thumbing casually through a newspaper in the studio as he recorded this stuff. Totally ridiculous, and probably the sort of thing that would drive away 99% of prospective listeners. Luckily, you are one of the elite 1%, my friend. That's why we're both here.
It was no coincidence though, for Himroo textiles drew from cotton grown locally and together with silk, the fabric that eventually emerged from the handicrafts industry, owing as much to its unique designs as its texture came to be sought after besides lending Aurangabad prominence through the middle ages, from as far back as the reign of Mohammed Tughlaq and Malik Ambar.
80Fame, wealth, and honour! what are you to Love?
My heart has not been in full surrender to neither the reality of Jesus nor the love of Jesus. Through some vulnerability with great friends and wise words from a lot of them and other sources (J.D. Greer's "gospel" series, for instance) I've realized that true contentment and peace can only come from a love for God, which can only be through a love for Jesus Himself.
I mean, we wanted a dog, we said.
This was a branch of the Co-op, previously Somerfield. It finally closed last week. I don’t know what will come afterwards. The 1960s Aer Lingus building is looking very tatty these days and was earmarked to be demolished, though the plans for a hotel and retail development to replace it are pre-credit crunch, so who knows whether they will go ahead. We have a habit in Glasgow, even in good times, of demolishing buildings and leaving the vacant site for a while, say thirty or forty years, until someone figures out what to do with it.
#20 Sigur Rós
It's a great time to be in the industry and what with some big plans for North's 15th anniversary this year as well as the mega coup that is getting the EBBC in Leeds - it's gonna be fun!
85. When I finally caught up with Abraham Trahearne, he was drinking beer with an alcoholic bulldog named Fireball Roberts in a ramshackle joint just outside of Sonoma, California, drinking the heart right out of a fine spring afternoon. —James Crumley, The Last Good Kiss (1978)
Another interesting panel covered Publicity, Reviewing & Social Media. Panelists shared what's worked for them (or their clients), and pointed out that 30 minutes a day, in 10 minute intervals was enough time to spend with social networking. The new terms of service for Pinterest came up, and it was recommended as the new big thing. (I'm not going there yet). Social media should be used for name recognition, not promotion.
b) John Balliol, John Comyn, Robert Bruce
“I like that sex work is finally being spoken about in terms of health and safety,” says Avonia.
C. S. Lakin is novelist and writing coach who spends her time divided between developing new book ideas and helping writers polish theirs. She is the author of twelve novels – six contemporary novels and six in the fantasy/sci-fi genre. Whether she is exploring the depths of the human psyche and pushing her characters to the edge of desperation, or embellishing an imaginary world replete with talking pigs and ancient magical curses, she is doing what she loves best – using her creativity and skills to inspire and affect her readers.
So, yea...I went to Paducah this year...This was my 12th year and for the first time I stayed for longer than one day...Four of us left Tuesday morning and came back Thursday.. We had a great time and I didn't buy all that much.. I did buy a quilt kit, which I have NEVER done before..I turned the corner and there was the quilt hanging in the booth and I picked it up and bought it... It came with all the fabric and pattern and it will be the next project. I also bought a 12 1/2 inch square up ruler..and a ruler by Bloc Loc that is truly unique.. There is a groove carved out of wrong side so the seams of your block sit into the grooves and allows you to trim the block without movement.. I bought the flying geese ruler... and I think that is really all I bought... oh no...i forgot...I bought some Kona at Hancocks of Paducah...and some great decorator weight fabric to do this...
Kitty Slade is definitely cool: a London kid with attitude and eyeball rolling to match. But she's a teen with a secret: she has inherited phantorama from her Greek mother. Phantorama is the ability to see ghosts and, as Kitty finds out, eventually communicate with them.
Dish in bird house: Anthropologie
Who would say that the moral climate today is not much worse?
We had such a good time on this trip - and the kids got both camping and the beach! =)
And I exhale.
TV – 45 (842)
"I was perfect"
Anyway, if you are feeling restless like me and want an organizational change, here is an idea that I've used in the past. Rods and cups from IKEA kitchen department. Lord knows I'm not the most organized of teachers, but this REALLY works excellently for table supplies-crayons, markers, glue sticks, scissors, pencils--you name it. I had a very, very, very tiny classroom at my previous school and this system worked well because I had absolutely no table, shelf or counter space.
I have pretty much set up the plot already, but a probe is flying through space, constantly blaring out a whale song message while disabling ay ship it comes across. When it reaches Earth and gets no answer from whales, it blots out the sun and begins boiling the oceans. I hate it when call and no one’s home, too, but geez, I do not burn their house down in anger. The probe’s actions are necessary to have a conflict in the movie, but think about the message it sends; it does not matter if we preserve endangered species, because at some point, an alien probe is going to come destroy the environment anyway.
- My husband gave me a gorgeous pink sapphire cocktail ring which I created an entire outfit around for this trip. Of course, the ring is back at home - without me or the outfit. I hope it has a great weekend, too.
OK, bear with me. So Alex usually takes Lucien to karate class every Saturday so he can discuss workouts with Thor. But since Al was in Venice last weekend, I took him. I was able to watch the tail end of the class, the part where Thor pairs the kids up for some light sparring. They don't really land any hard hits or kicks, they just kind of circle each other practicing the motions.
But, the point of interest tonight is watching television, and specifically the finale of The Biggest Loser. The person who won lost more than half of his body weight. I watched the final episode while eating a Milky Way. That makes me feel like a bad person, and I can totally see how people end up on the show. I vow to never watch it again.
I've found a good man.
Local bars and restaurants listen up - get this in your beer portfolio now and replace one of those seven macro lagers with this instant classic! Why is this only available at two local bars/restaurants?
For tea we went to a street vendor and got a pizza bread thing, we then went to a cafe/bar and watched the world go by. It is incredible how many scooters are in Ha Noi, and what looks like total chaos on the unmarked roads, but for the whole hour we watched we saw no crashes and pedestrians walking freely between the traffic with ease, although Ha Noi was very busy it didn’t feel anywhere near as rushed and hectic as Beijing, but I think if you put the drivers of Hanoi in Beijing there would be crashes every few seconds because the roads are so different, but the mentalities the same!
Spring Fling: Find your pet Spring Rabbit another one to love in each of the towns listed below. (See the starting towns list above). Buy or find a Spring Rabbit’s Foot. Summon it up in the towns as you look for eggs, chances are you’ll have it done in no time. You might need to work with a friend for the less common towns if you put it off longer then the first day (chances are first day, every one of the towns will have a fair number of people). The pet costs 100 chocolate if you don’t find it in an egg.
Half Lemon
Moonraker.
You are beautiful on the inside and out.
Here we have some 1950s wool slacks, 1950s nordic sweater, J. Crew blouse, and Bass saddle shoes....
I have reached the half way point of my fundraising, I hope to get help from my local Rotary club to help arrange a big event to act as a fundraiser.
So, you wonder, what's up with the plastic cup sitting on the counter? Is is the drink I sorely need to deal with a buggy Blogger module? Is it to keep myself hydrated? Is it just a reminder of the time Bet and I took our little girls to the zoo to see the wild animals?
-- Pet Staff Quest
As foolish as it seems now, I actually thought that I could assemble a rocket from pipes and other scraps, pack it full of powder I had stolen from shotgun shells (certain that I was giving them a ‘higher purpose’), and then launch it, and myself, into history. So inattentive to, and uninterested in, my activities were those around me, that I avoided serious injury and possible death only because I figured out on my own just how dangerous and ineffective my design was. I finally just gave up on the idea.
I love blogging it is the place where I can organise my thoughts and turn them into expressible opinions. I am very clear that my primary purpose in blogging is to inform myself, if other people derive some benefit from my blogs it is a happy side effect. At this point I should perhaps thank those of you who have been kind enough to comment kindly on my blogs, actually I suppose I should thank every one who has commented regardless. As I have admitted recently I use blogging as a tool to recognise my own thought processes as much of the time they are amorphous and only become concrete to me when observed from the third person position. Also the process of blogging frequently stimulates recall – I have a great memory but patchy recall.
Overall this is an impresssive, classy addition to the numerous Belgian bars around Tokyo (Frigo, Belgo, etc).
Stronger
Once beyond the rock salt corridor, the sound quickly diminished into funereal silence. Casting her oil lamp high revealed a vast chamber of unknown dimensions beyond her little circle of light. The floor was of mosaic tile, so ancient and dust covered as to be completely indecipherable. Occasional columns of the same mosaic rose up into the darkness overhead.
-- Kingsley Amis
350 ml beer (I prefer VB) @ room temp
As ugly as it was, and it was so ugly, I also gained some important insight.
Final total = $1.51 + tax
“Oh please, no!” Olivia pleaded.
The Socialist intellectual David Goodhart in Prospects (March 1998), quoted Conservative M.P. David Willetts on the Welfare State: "The basis on which you can extract large sums of money in tax and pay it out in benefits is that most people think the recipients are people like themselves, facing difficulties which they themselves could face. If values become more diverse, if lifestyles become more differentiated, then it becomes more difficult to sustain the legitimacy of a universal risk-pooling welfare state. People ask, 'Why should I pay for them when they are doing things I wouldn't do? … Progressives want diversity but they thereby undermine part of the moral consensus on which a large welfare state rests... The traditional conservative Burkean view is that our affinities ripple out from our families and localities, to the nation and not very far beyond. That view is pitted against a liberal universalist one which sees us in some sense equally obligated to all human beings from Bolton to Burundi … .”
Apologies again for the naff piccies but I'm still using my mums old camera till I buy a new one after mine died. The image I printed onto elegance satin cardstock so I could colour it in with my promarkers. I added a little sakura clear glaze pen over the strawberries in the basket which made them "pop". The red gingham papers are off the CD rom and the large heart doilies I bought from poundland. These were really good value but are only good on 8x8 cards due to their size. The sentiment I did on the computer - I think the font is "Clear typewriter" which is a freebie download
"GADO-GADO"
Cannon is located outside of Clovis, New Mexico which is an area popular with science-fiction photographers and movie makers because the landscape looks just like what you'd expect on an alien planet from another solar system. It's flat and endless.
Moving on to my birthday… Erm, actually, the day before my birthday. It’s a tradition in my family to surprise the birthday celebrator (?) with a cake and have them blow out their birthday candles and eat cake at midnight (when we’d honestly rather be asleep on the weekdays) but seeing as everyone had to wake up A LOT earlier than usual the next day, I blew out my candles after dinner.
Saturday May 5th and Sunday May 6th
The statement that the mind, body and world are permeated or saturated with awareness or presence, implies that there is an independent mind, body and world present in the first place, which could be permeated by something that is other than or separate from itself, in the way that a sponge is permeated with water. But this is to start with the belief in the independent reality of the mind, body and world that are, in fact, never found as such.
In the immortal words of Crash Davis….Well, I believe in the soul, the c*&$#, the p*@!*, the small of a woman’s back, the hanging curve ball, high fiber, good scotch, that the novels of Susan Sontag are self-indulgent, overrated crap. I believe Lee Harvey Oswald acted alone. I believe there ought to be a constitutional amendment outlawing Astroturf and the designated hitter. I believe in the sweet spot, soft-core pornography, opening your presents Christmas morning rather than Christmas Eve and I believe in long, slow, deep, soft, wet kisses that last three days….
"innovative studies in how the size and proportion of objects should influence their design, Mogensen, collaborating with Grethe Meyer, produced a project in 1954 called the Boligens Byggeskabe (Construction Cupboards of the House), which introduced the idea of building shelving and storage units as part of a room, rather than purchasing and placing them in the space"
Nov 2002 Nevada does the same
“It’s a criminal offence to lie to Parliament. There will come a time when this committee has had enough of these half-truths.”
I have an idea that I would love your help with.
"For information about the balance and recharging, press 1
the concept was interesting and we had a lot of fun taking photos in the cafe.
We used the feather/fern fabric for the underside of the quilt. It really ties in all the other colors nicely.
Of course that never happened. Has anyone read the book?
#3 According to CNBC, some analysts are projecting that the unemployment rate in Spain is going to go above 30 percent.
When you find yourself in the middle of one of lifes many storms, who do you want in the boat with you?? You want the people that have your back..always. You need a person who will smack you around when you screw up as well as smack around other people when they try and take you down.
2. Restore movement by stretching shortened ligaments resulting from chronic joint stiffness.
I took pictures a couple weeks ago, but never posted them. Today, I took more pictures, so I'll combine it all in this post and show you some of the progress.
I asked if a candidate was behind the poll. “We’re just an public opinion research firm,” I was told. “We’re not hired by either of them. We just have a client who gives us these jobs."
It took me a long time to figure out what I was going to do for it. I didn't want to load up on treats.... and I didn't have energy to do crazy things (aka spend 3 hours turning Laffy taffy and Starbursts into enough peas and carrots to fill a fake chicken pot pie), and I wanted my kids to not waste the food.
it was 2 weeks ago but I've been swamped with school (well, not really considering how good of a procrastinator I am) and playing tour guide with my lovely friends and family that paid me visits within that time frame.
The U.S. Geological Survey recently estimated the North Cuban Basin contains as much as 9 billion barrels of oil and 22 trillion cubic feet of natural gas. Other estimates range from 5 billion to 20 billion barrels of crude. Pools of oil and natural gas tend not to obey lines drawn on a map. It’s certain that at least some of Cuba’s wells will be tapping oil pools that straddle the boundary separating our zone from Cuba’s, meaning Havana will be getting oil that should be ours.
But what can be accomplished after so many years?
The Guardian (or is the Observer?) has a wee interview with the lass here, including this very strange picture of Karen remembering that she's left the oven on whilst pretending to be... well we're not sure what, a fairy cake perhaps.
Hope y'all are all doing well!! Thanks for stopping by :)
Do I need to say more?
Hambo also shared three of their designers as guest design team members today. Here are their wonderful cards:
More of this sort of thing, please, Gráinne and Tim.
I had gotten some notes mentioning that you would like to take a peak into my fridge....
Death, I believe, comes at the top of the list for stress and divorce is quite high up in the list (I have never been divorced).
So when VerdictfromtheMrs asked me to get a cake together for her office (the reason being a birthday) I jumped at the chance. I am trying to stay off cake so it was a good excuse for making one without being tempted to then stuff it.
(PS - I tried to add mini chocolate chips to my popsicles but they all sunk to the bottom - anyone know a good trick for suspending them throughout? I also attempted to wait until the mixture had partially frozen and then add them but had trouble distributing them that way too.)
When I decided to cross over to digital art, I wanted something that was affordable, user friendly, and reliable. Wacom is the leading brand in the graphics tablet world, and they've been making them for years, so naturally I turned to their affordable Bamboo line. I picked up my Bamboo Pen for $69.99. So far it's been a nice, functional little tablet; and worth every penny.
Sunday morning the beast (for those that don’t know the beast is me when I’ve been unceremoniously woken up) was awoken: firstly at 5.30 by a debate over whether a cycling event was going to take place in the god awful weather. Several text messages that I heard through lovely tap tapping of haptic feedback and a couple of phone calls later it was established that the event was cancelled: could you not have simply gone and stood outside for a minute my love, that would have told you all you needed to know surely (gale force winds and torrential rain do tend to be a bit of a giveaway)?
Azteca argued that it is not necessary that the mark be "right next to" the description. Some of the text included in the mark also appears in the description of the product, thereby connecting the goods to the mark. Only one product is described on the webpage.
and experienced the things depicted in these photos.
emerged in one fluid moment.
Don't forget our 1,000 Facebook Fan celebration starting this Friday! We are having a fabulous giveaway and I am so psyched to tell you there will be something for everything. Something special for our blogger family and a special addition that EVERYONE will love!!! I am busting to tell you.... Like us on Facebook to get more clues and keep up with our day to day events, photos and meals.
Salmon is a favorite, and I am sure to have a couple of cans of Alaskan Wild Caught Salmon in my pantry for the time I am out of the fresh version. So I decided to make my Salmon Salad to compliment the Hummus and cabbage.
In 1909 the Driskill opened a Turkish bath on the premises. The bath featured hot sulphur water, which in those days was thought to have curative powers. This amenity proved so popular that the Driskill began to take business away from such Texas resorts as Mineral Wells and Sulphur Springs.
On a slightly different note, some would say “Why would you even need compliments, in the first place? Isn’t it a sign of insecurity in itself to seek compliments from others?” Yes, it may as well be in some cases but we’re not talking about the receiving end. I guess what the moral of the tip is…
It was 34 years ago this week that the Sex Pistols released the song, ‘God save the Queen’
- 1/4 tsp baking soda
He had been reading my emails, text messages. He even scanned my phone bills.
Baby girl is an angel. Sleeps, eats, and is just all around adorable.
It would be dumb to expect a different outcome given the same series of events occurs in each one of my pregnancies. No matter what outward influence we exert on my body, it doesn't seem to have an affect. We want more than anything for this baby to live, to hold him/her in our arms in January, but we just can't visualize it. As much as we are hoping for the best, we are expecting the worst. Andrew and I had a nice long talk and decided if we make it into the second trimester again, or further, and lose another baby, we will probably stop trying. The idea of experiencing that level of pain even one more time is too much. In some ways, our losses have brought us so much closer together, but they have also put a huge strain on our relationship.
Based on the number of posts shared at last week's party, I'm guessing you have all been a tad busy over the holidays ;) We are gearing up for the Chinese New Year over here. I am told that we will find ourselves in the middle of non-stop fireworks... 24 hours a day... for several days on end! Are we crazy for staying in China over the holiday??? I guess we shall find out! haha...
Mr Aptroot, how about the Thatcherite dogmas of your party (and some other parties) which caused these railway problems in the first place. The Dutch Socialist Party and others had proposed to re-nationalize the railways before; the VVD, now Johnny-come-latelies after the Amsterdam disaster and before the September parliamentary elections, opposed that then.
Add ground beef mixture, beef stock, tomato sauce, and tomato paste. Cover and cook over medium-low heat for 15 minutes.
Grazing systems vary on each farm and geographic region and are tailored to meet the needs of each particular livestock species and the forages present.
Ok, back now? Good. Did you notice the anachronism? There’s a big, glaring one, but it’s much more dramatic looking when the shirt opens all the way down the front instead of only partway down from the neck. So…good cinematic choice, bad historical detail.
Finally, for those of you that wish to go that “extra mile,” the next time you go to the bathroom, look at yourself in the mirror and either out loud or to yourself, say these words, three times in a row:
Today is the day! In just a few hours, I will be getting my root canal, and it would not have been possible without your help. Thank you to everyone who has linked, tweeted, prayed, and hit my tip jar.
"Hey, kamusta? I'm on my way to Ortigas."
2 tablespoons cherry brandy
And strawberries.
It sounds as if the color is new to you, too, and you’re a little unsure as to what it goes with. When I’ve got an item in a funny color, sometimes I just pretend it’s black. So, if the cardigan were black, what would you pair it with? Once you’ve freed your mind from the “oh God it’s purple and matches nothing” dilemma, you can create some unexpected and interesting looks. You could be that girl who always wears the purple sweater.
Herman Cain out of the race?
It’s that simple!
Duchess, in the short time we had together I was granted the bliss of being your friend. I will never forget you. As we became familiar with each other, I found myself in constant awe of your beauty and your dignity. You did not deserve to be abandoned in that apartment almost 9 years ago. You deserved to be loved and cherished. Though I know the people from the shelter loved you. They often asked about you and I know they will be saddened to hear of your passing. My world was a better place because you were in it Duchess. I miss you, my friend. I miss you so very much.
Here is the recipe for the Roasted Kabocha - Real Ale Mini Cakes with Brown Sugar Cream. It is adapted from the original which I found here: http://www.epicurious.com/recipes/food/views/Kabocha-Squash-Cake-with-Brown-Sugar-Cream-239812.
Yes, I suppose there is a possibility the Serpa holster could fail to release the pistol under some rare conditions. Balanced against that is the purpose of the Serpa mechanism, to retain the pistol when an unauthorized person tries to take it away. It's a trade off.... and an important one to consider. Most of life is like that, take a certain level of chance to reach a certain level of reward. Some days, the very risk of walking out the the front door is substantial, yet we still manage to make it pay off... most of the time, at least.
Ben & Jerry's Fro Yo in Chocolate Brownie
Dr. William Focazio is the founder of Pain Alternatives, Solutions and Treatment, a group that treats retired NFL players and other former athletes. Focazio and his people do not only provide free medical testing and care, because they run into so many ex-athletes who are destitute, they are even likely to pay for travel and lodging when the athletes fly in to see them from out of town.
Albany has come to represent a number of things to me. When we lived in southern Africa, our trips home always included a visit to Mum and Dad. Their home is set on 500 acres of undulating farm land, much of it still covered with Australian bush. It was always a pleasure to see them again and get away from the busy and demanding African bustle. It was also a pleasure to be able to drive in Albany and shop peacefully (as opposed to being chased down the street by enterprising Africans, trying to sell their latest produce). Strolling down York Street with the harbour looming and the wide bay was a tonic.
“I have no time for gossip Padre, I have work to do”
When I heard my ex mention “friends arrested”, I automatically assumed the worst and I panicked. I thought it had something to do with me and the business I had previously been involved in. Paranoid much?… you have no idea. Chalk that up to one of the many side effects of coming off of drugs…more of which I’ll explain later and in future blogs to come. This is why I can’t stress enough about how badly drugs fuck your whole shit up.
“Oh I have been to Ludlow Fair/And left my necktie God knows where,” wrote A.E. Houseman over a century ago. During his lifetime Houseman was best known as a classical scholar and so his “pints and quarts of Ludlow beer” may have been, like another recently boasted 14 pints a day, more a product of imagination than of memory.
Materials: Sensory Table
Express News’ Twitter account has 13,509 followers with a Klout of 46, while The Express Tribune account has 20,016 followers with a Klout of 64.
Musing of days already passed,
I was wondering if it were winter that has got me down at the moment, but I’ve never been too bothered by this season. There’s so much beauty in it, you know.
Thorn laughed. “Detective, they’re just symbols.”
Reserve your appointment today, limited availability on Black Friday & Saturday!
“Since this has happened, he has paid every single penny back with interest, a little over $7,000. He feels sick about it. He served his brothers for over 10 years he was secretary-treasurer of that union. Never that entire time, until the Crohn’s disease occurred, was there a penny missing.”
i created a board based on this idea below:
Your voice the temperance of my soul, each phrase, pause and subtle pitch tuning my soul into balance.
Often times I find myself telling my children that they cannot have what they want - not because it's an impossible goal but because it's not good for them. For example: they aren't allowed to stay up all hours of the night playing video games. That would wreak havoc on their bodies and brains. Reaching the treasure chest to win Link's hover boots isn't nearly as important as getting a good night's sleep, but when they are in the "zone" they aren't considering that. They only know that they want to continue playing the game. That's when momma has to stand before the power button and say "save now or lose your progress."
"It looks like they're accepting Ms Madikizela-Mandela's word above my own," said Odendaal.
But then that ends the list. I have seen great friendships. I’d say I am a good friend too. Not that I have the right to judge myself but then again, no one knows my heart and my circumstances like I do. I have no ego unless forged or forced or situationally placed. I have seen ever lasting loyalty too. But I have also seen it fail. For no reason at all. Sometimes with mutual understanding and at other times as a result of ego. But today I can say I have “truly” grown up… or matured. If I was in the position I am in now, say six years ago, I’d be all over the place. But being aware of the farce truth and smiling and realising it rather than being sprawled over the floor surrounded by habitants of a tissue box- to me is growth and maturity.
Daytime temperatures were in the low-70s in Silver City when we left, and they’ve been gradually creeping up as we move onward towards the great state of Maine. It was 87 when we arrived in Russellville last night, and it feels close to that here in Jackson.
And, it is known that when a minimum of three of these needs are met by our actions they become habitual.
And that's it for me . . . I'll see y'all tomorrow! Hugs . . .
I could write about my thoughts on raising Noah, and if I would have adopted him if I knew then all of the emotional and behavioral problems he would be struggling with now.
Today fans of sports entertainment are collectively basking in the afterglow of last night’s WWE Extreme Rules Pay-Per-View. As we regale one another with fond memories of the event, one of the best WWE produced events so far this year, we should take some time to discuss one match that has been grossly overlooked by at least ninety percent of the company’s supporters and detractors.
Frankly, I like that God has made promises to us and that all of the effort is on Him and not us.
Garnish with the fried onions and coriander leaves and serve with some cucumber raita.
Hamas is already talking about the success of this tactic and about raising the price for the release of Shalit. There is no question that there will be more 'operations' designed to capture or kill Israelis, especially now that the deterrent factor has been so reduced.
I know I've said it before, but it's worth saying again. I'm so pleased to have discovered and joined the Flying Unicorns community. They are such a feisty and fun group with a brilliant sense of humour and high output of creative talent.
We lost more of our snow yesterday, heard robins in the yard this morning...
Both with the tabouli and the fact that I can make it in larger quantities and cheaper for what I can buy it. Also, I can put as much mint in it as I want. I wanted a lot! The same goes with the dressing which can involve as much lemon/lime juice, olive oil and seasoning as you want. It makes me once again so grateful that I'm over my fear of cooking, preparing and eating food. The preparing part has been the final piece for me to conquer and step by step, I feel like I am getting there.
France and other African dictators
Anyway, we spent some time taking in the scenery from the deck Friday night before everybody got there. I just noticed that you can see my reflection in the window... creepy.
Annoying morning person: (With growing agitation) You don’t know what you’re missing out on.
Being the coffee lover that I am ;)
Tony Green / Five poems /10-12
Finally, trust and be patient (this is where I’m at right now). I trust that right now, I’m meant to fall in love with myself and no one else. Truly, madly, deeply in love with myself. When I’m meant to be with someone, I’ll meet the perfect man in Vancouver who is also solid and grounded in who he is. But you know what? I haven’t met this guy yet. I trust that he’s out there, but I’m not worried about meeting him. If we’re all the same (energetically speaking that is; I am you, you are me, I am the trees, I am the earth, et cetera), then falling in love with myself is pretty much the same as falling in love with someone else anyways.
The reason I've avoided a schedule so far is that in an ideal world I would have no structure. I love being able to just write a random blog at four o'clock in the afternoon, or at midnight, about anything that happens to pop into my head. After the Challenge though, and having a firm idea of what my posts were going to be - and knowing what was expected of me - I'm at a bit of a loss to remember how my blog felt before April.
So to summarize, according to Facebook it has a valuation of at least $50 billion, the latest valuation from third party investors is $70 billion, and the highest valuation private markets have given the social network has been $80 billion. Some expect Facebook to be valued at somewhere near $100 billion when it goes public. Most of these numbers were being thrown around prior to Google+’s arrival on the scene launched and definitely before Google started a price war with Facebook.
Office of the Solicitor General Felix Bautista Angelo, Assistant Solicitor General Ruperto Kapunan, Jr., Solicitor Martiniano P. Vico and Assistant City Fiscal Julio Villamor for respondents.
Ultimately, Kevin Brophy has delivered an intriguing novel about identity that is loosely swaddled in the trappings of the spy novel. - Declan Burke
Disc 3 - Hot Buttered Xhol (15:45)
and madrassa Islamic schools to preach hate in Australia , New Zealand ,
Apart from the ‘beautiful game’ there isn’t a game on this earth that gets my attention like cricket does. While I was growing up, listening to the radio under my pillow to cricket commentary from the UK tours was the stuff of magic.
For instance, My Grand Advent Calendar Plan was to knit 24 little mittens, and then fill them with goodies before the 1st.
But I accepted it and buried the doubts deep into my sub-conscious, because that is what all healthy well-bred people do. Until one month ago, when Paul and I attended the Boston car show. It seems such an unlikely event to stir up the past. But we can only push down thoughts for so long before they bubble back up to the surface.
Horatio G. Spafford and his wife, Anna, were pretty well-known in 1860’s Chicago. And this was not just because of Horatio's legal career and business endeavors. The Spaffords were also prominent supporters and close friends of D.L. Moody, the famous preacher. In 1870, however, things started to go wrong. The Spaffords' only son was killed by scarlet fever at the age of four. A year later, it was fire rather than fever that struck. Horatio had invested heavily in real estate on the shores of Lake Michigan. In 1871, every one of these holdings was wiped out by the great Chicago Fire.
A rich red rose from a bunch of flowers given to my mum.
“Maybe it’s just you Helen” he felt a tense throbbing knot form between his eyebrows.
If we trust our kids, support them, and give them safe places to practice, they will learn all the skills they need to learn, as long as they are physically capable of doing so.
The most ridiculous aspect of this memo is that the supervisors and owners of my previous place of work never owned up to their mistakes, even after driving some of their best workers away on multiple occasions. This company has a history of harassing its employees and blatantly covers their misconduct, pretending their workers are the problem. In reality, the problem is with the owners. I don’t call slashing employee meal benefits and berating workers when they make simple mistakes being part of a very good solution. Their only solution is to shut up all unsatisfied and severely underpaid workers to make an extra couple of dollars. I simply tried to call in sick as to not infect my customers but they would rather send me to be unemployed with my fiance (who has been jobless for ever five months) I don’t see how a person with a heart or a company in our community with a conscious could do such a thing. Oh, by the way, their food is processed and mostly frozen anyway, fresh bread my ass!
Trim the tips from a few of the skinniest spears for garnish, if desired. Slice the rest of the asparagus into 1-inch pieces. Add the asparagus pieces and herbes de provence (or herbs of your choice). Simmer until the asparagus is tender, about 3-5 minutes. Transfer the soup to a food processor and blend, or use an immersion blender, leaving the soup a little chunky. Add lemon juice and black pepper to taste.
They were once kids.
CUTTING OFF EMOTIONAL TIES
Seasonals: Brass Knuckles Oatmeal Stout, Black Mystic Java Stout, Beastie Barrel Porter, Beastie Barrel Stout, Oak Aged Barfly IPA, Count Hopula IPA
My Life as a Dog (Sweden) directed by Lasse Hallstrom
I could see where she was coming from, but also he - it was darkish but not mild in the sense of roast barley. Possibly it could be a mild because there was very little hops present in it (ironically Chala was drinking the One Off and found the Lazy Days too bitter, which, trying them in strength order, makes sense, as its the only one with notciable bitterness). Back to the One off, it was again quite sweet but there was also another taste in there.
I might as well talk about the things I am trying to change or think I can change.
The pension funds panicked, realizing that their members would hold them responsible for exploding prices of gasoline at the pump. Pension funds withdrew one-third of their funds and oil prices fell from about $150 per barrel to $50. If you want to read the detailed analysis, go to my paper cited above—it has to do with commodities indexes, strategies pushed by your favorite blood sucking vampire squid (Goldman Sachs), and futures contracts. It gets wonky. To make a long story short, the bubble ended in fall of 2008.
As long as the zombie subroutines are running smoothly, the CEO can sleep. It is only when something goes wrong (say, all departments suddenly find that their business models have catastrophically failed) that the CEO is rung up.
Social media done right is about building long-term relationships, kind of the way we build friendships in the real world; and it is hard work.
I rather like all the new action in the stairway... and I can't wait till I get my new junk parcel in the mail and pretty the area up with that. Come on package! :)
Blogging - yep I know - you are already so busy how are you ever going to find the time to blog??? But blogging is FREE ADVERTISING for your site and important for ranking well at Google. Search engines index individual pages in their results - use your blog post as an opportunity to rank high in the search engine results for an important search term relevant to your business. It doesn't bring results overnight but the links last forever.
We're working a lot with prepositions now....oral, written, drawing, copying, using our stuffed animals to demonstrate our prepositions...lots of fun things to keep them interested. The Kindle is still sought out during reading time....but the lure of the gadget doesn't always keep this one awake. I am so thankful that she can get the extra sleep when she needs it...homeschool gives us this flexibility.
The first 3 were at 6:30 - 7 right on the edge of the X ring. I adjusted up 3 for the next group and up 2 more for the final group. With one flyer at 9.
A potentially simple, effective executive benefits option, Self Owned Life and Retirement (S.O.L.A.R.) insurance arrangements, may provide advantages to both businesses and key employees. To better understand this emerging trend I’d like to offer five tips to a successful executive benefits sale.
I feel privileged to be participating in the Shabby Vintage Junk Extravaganza for the second time & am looking forward to creating a visual feast to entice & delight our visitors.
Song title: I Can’t Make You Love Me
Matthew Metzger and Mike Schuh: No Sudden Moves
“What I did here was deserved. What follows is only what ya’ll decide,” the stranger said to the crowd.
But the actors knew the plot had changed
Another way to celebrate is to take out all your vintage embroidered hearts. I didn't realize the variety in which our fore-mothers designed their hearts. These are just some of the hearts that I've recently sold in my eBay store.
Fashion being nature’s early adapter has even found a buzzword – transitional wear - for such style limbo. This clothing sub-set is often overlooked for its outwardly functional appearance, but as my mother would say ‘when all fruit fails, welcome haws.’ Hence the perennial popularity of wellingtons and parkas long after the power supply has been turned off at Electric Picnic. It’s a bit like a circuit breaker - these sensible basics keep one grounded in said seasonal surges. Reassuringly practical.
“Your daughter’s dog?” I ventured. I suddenly felt a serious sense of unease with the way this conversation had begun, and started to regret making the call at all.
I love my SYDNEY girl.. she is stunning like my little one.
Wafa Sultan: They are people of this region, as is evident from the Islamic books and the Koran itself.
In the Dark Ages of the year 600, the murky backwaters of Europe were ruled by ignorance and superstition, and nothing changed from generation to generation. The only persons who achieved any significant level of education were the Christian priesthood, and it was more indoctrination than education. The rest were denied all education other than apprentice training for the job their father had. Almost no one in Europe actually knew how to think as educated people do.
In celebration of the publication of Minette's Feast, I asked the author Susanna Reich to share some of her memories growing up reading with her parents. Reading this brought back so many memories for me, and reminded me of all we give our children sharing that time together, reading together and talking about what books mean to us.
January 28, 2009: I Will Die As A Martyr Shooting Jews
Apparently the beers, named Eve and Animee are lighter, less carbonated and wait for it....bloat resistent! Bloat resistent!!! hahahahahaha......what a pile of steaming dung! At this point that's all I'm going to say about the beers because they won't be worth writing about.
Seared scallops with coriander and tamarind, crushed lime and cumin peas and monkfish steak with curry leaf and cucumber salad paired with the Taittinger Prelude Grands Crus NV was great! The Prelude is quite a rich and full wine, a blend of Grand Cru chardonnay and pinot noir, aged for 4 years before release. If you’re a fan of cumin, the Prelude made it jump out and the richness of the wine was not lost, if anything, I could really taste the citron flavours of the wine.
SANTORUM: All three of these folks sound great and I agree with them. I would just add that health savings account, which I introduced 20 years ago with John Kasich, is really the fundamental reform of getting consumers back involved in the health care system.
This fun, quirky book was written by Alexandra Robbins. “The Geeks Shall Inherit the Earth” is about seven real people battling with uncertainties of high school life. There’s the Loner, The Popular B*tch, The Nerd, The New Girl, The Gamer, The Weird Girl, and The Band Geek. She intertwines these narratives -often triumphant, sometimes heartbreaking, always captivating with essays exploring the secrets of popularity, and other high school clichés. She makes the reader understand that being the odd one out isn’t a bad thing, in fact, it may be the best thing.
The problem I have with English is that it so rarely sums up the states of mind/body/soul that I’m in, completely. (And I’m sure that goes for everyone else, too.) On Sunday, I was remarking to the Fellow* that I needed a word for when you are in the know about some place/thing/event, but then there’s an extra awesome layer to it that you only just discovered, which other people knew about but you didn’t, leaving you feeling simultaneously annoyed at being in the dark about it (even though it’s no one’s fault), and thrilled that now you’ve improved your knowledge. (The context: a sculpture downtown that I adore and tell everyone to visit apparently rotates when you push it, which I had no idea about until I saw a team of people do it. And the Fellow apparently knew the whole time. Rrr!) Things like that are too complex for single words.
Chop some spring onion, one small clove garlic, a small piece of ginger and a little red chilli for colour and heat. Set aside.
027.035 YUSUFALI: "But I am going to send him a present, and (wait) to see with what (answer) return (my) ambassadors."
Gone to flowers, everyone.
“So stand up and then get the generator,” he ordered.
“You lied. My husband is in there.”
-On 2.7.12 you had your first play date! We visited Page and Selah, had lunch together, and played. You enjoyed taking it all in and talked to me a bunch about it later that day!
The vein in Grayson’s temple bulged and throbbed, blurring his vision. He closed his eyes and pinched the bridge of his nose with thumb and forefinger as he crushed Elizabeth’s note in his other hand.
Watch the skies. The Plejarans and Arcturians are planning a mass sighting and broad telepathic message to those who open to “hearing.”
Was the saddest thing he'd ever seen.
Social is a discussion. Not a thumbs up.
Watching other parents has always inspired me. I tend to learn a lot from hearing how others interact, what they say, how they deal with a situation, etc. In the past few days, I've really run into a few parents that I realize REALLY inspire me and if I could just hang out with them more, I think I'd be a better parent because of it! :o)
In 14 days I will be joining 5 of my quilting friends and attending a Storytellers in Cloth Quilt Retreat at the Heritage Conference Center in Southbury, Ct. Two of my friends went last year, had such a good time and convinced the rest of us to go this year. I love retreats, so I really wanted to go, but had to find a roommate... Thanks Aline!
It really is a wild scenario. I'm curious to see how it all goes. It is not a system of things in which the players are contained within national boundaries, so actually following the money and motives is much more difficult than some think. I can't follow it, but I can see the ripples and many of the actions which result in these "Crises".
On January 18, 1887, new Governor Lawrence Sullivan “Sul” Ross celebrated his inaugural with a ball at the Driskill. The menu included raw oysters, consommé a la cohort, spiced salmon, roast turkey, ham, roast chicken, beef tongue, corned beef, lamb tongue, escalloped oysters, fried oysters (good thing there was an “r” in the month), chicken salad, lobster salad, boned chicken in jelly, lemon ice cream, vanilla ice cream, assorted cakes, confectionery, compotes of fruit, nuts, raisins, and coffee. It’s a wonder anyone could manage to dance that night.
It is easy to pull out a color family and move it to my coloring space. They take a prominent place on my desk, right next to my photo tent for my completed projects.
Dr sent me home with a glucose meter. Whatever, I’ll try it, I was thinking, but my blood sugar has always been fine, even with those nasty pregnancy tests.
Do you remember your grandparent’s house? What treasure trove of memories does it hold for you?
Verify the Verse:
Social Science Research Network
Dear Board Members of the Tucson Unified School District:
So Zak finishes the season with the 6th place Orioles, bats a lean .255 and fields his position with a .905 percentage, right about in the middle of the league. Not bad for a rookie who never played the position before. In normal times, it would be a tough call to say whether or not his first season at Tarboro was good enough to keep him in professional baseball, but these were not normal times. During the off season the Japs attacked Pearl Harbor and the country was thrust into a two-front war. Any able-bodied men who didn't rush to volunteer were being scooped up by the draft and baseball at all levels was being affected. It was a time when men like Frankie Zak got their chance at baseball immortality.
Tomorrow’s the big day. Departure time 3.30pm Sydney airport. My mum, dad, brother and boyfriend are all accompanying me and seeing me off. The tears will be flowing.
Be Blessed,
It’s a feature length episode due to broadcast on Saturday 7 January 2012, what better way than to spend the first Saturday of the New Year curled up on the sofa watching some quality BBC drama?!
I blog about what we've been working on and snap a few close-ups, but I do not take any of those sweeping, whole-room, magazine-worthy shots. So I was thinking. What if I created a mosaic using the pics I've taken inside our tiny house since I started blogging, and shared that with you?
Terrible. All of the things that I say are so terribly juvenile and over dramatic. You were right the entire time. What are emotions if something that are contrived from fantastical scenarios that will never happen? I dreamt of you the other day. It was odd, with gaps in between. But nevertheless, you were drenched in sunlight and the day was mild. The scenery was beyond average, and your hair was gorgeous. I am always stagnant in my dreams, and you are forever mobile, evading me, even until the last second I wake up. I reach to you to hold you; let it be your hand, hips, or harrowing aura. But no, you race behind the forest. Years gone by. Land shifts and your are now across the ocean. Tell me what you think? But you don’t. You shift alongside the waves of wheat or barely or whatever the fields are full of.
The problem simply isn’t where your blog post seems to be pointing, that’s all.
as mums we always appreciate when someone else cooks, be it our husband, or at a restaurant, even fish and chips! its such a blessing to us when the family is sick when someone drops off a meal.
10-25-2011
Sec. 13. That the Government of the Philippine Islands, subject to the provisions of this Act and except as herein provided, shall classify according to its agricultural character and productiveness, and shall immediately make rules and regulations for the lease, sale, or other disposition of the public lands other than timber or mineral lands, but such rules and regulations shall not go into effect or have the force of law until they have received the approval of the President, and when approved by the President they shall be submitted by him to Congress at the beginning of the next ensuing session thereof and unless disapproved or amended by Congress at said session they shall at the close of such period have the force and effect of law in the Philippine Islands: Provided, That a single homestead entry shall not exceed sixteen hectares in extent.
Peak, peek, and pique are homophones, words that have the same sound but different meanings. Other examples of homophones with which people torture the spelling-and-grammar-minded among us are: too, to, and two; their, they're, and there; and your, you're, and (less frequently) yore.
Twitter
That is until Parker’s Dad…and all of his assets (including Parker’s trust fund and home) are seized by the government. Parker is now homeless, and almost penniless looking at a pretty bleak future. Her only hope is renovating and selling a forgotten Aunt’s coastal home in rural Maine. Pumped up with hope, a new puppy, and a hot, but annoying minion of her father’s tagging along Parker may be able to change her life around…And she may find that her new life is worth far more than the wealthy one she lost…
Now as a newly-awakened vampire, this only adds to her day-to-day mundane burdens. Refusing to drain humans, she hunts birds for nourishment, and finagles a way to avoid going to classes during the day. But bigger problems loom ahead. Radical cops that know about her kind roam the night, seeking to destroy any and all ‘monsters’, and her best friend’s family has a bone to pick with Audra’s. Headless bodies are turning up on vamp and were turf, each side blaming the other for the murders. It’s up to Audra and her friend Lu to figure out who’s doing the killings, and their search leads them beneath the city streets to encounter an abomination neither one of them will ever forget.
I was asked to give an inspirational speech to a group of people one day and was not given much time. I had no topic, no computer to research or time to prepare; I only had whatever I could pull out of head. I remember going to sleep that night and praying to God to please send me an Angel in my sleep who could whisper words of wisdom into my ear. I somehow thought, as if by magic, I would have a nicely typed speech tied in a pretty blue bow waiting by my bed when I woke the next morning. If only things could be so easy!
1 T minced onions
I do not write unpleasant things about Barack Hussein Obama because he is a Democrat, a far-left liberal ideologue, a confirmed liar, or the sock-puppet of whatever cabal that chose him long ago to be the President. I write unpleasant things because he is all of these things, but also because he is the most stupid man to have ever held the office of President.
PS. While posting this, I did have a last intent re. the registration of the mark zero by AMBET and I found Nº do Processo: 903847701 which has been recently published by the Office: it is a combination containing a logo and the word zero written in a very distinctive way.
That's scary, thinking about how much of what we read is broken up by fancy, shimmery ads and different fonts and scrolling texts with coloured backgrounds.
A white English underclass were certainly involved in the riots, but as foot soldiers and followers enthusiastically embracing the new culture they have been told is so much cooler than their own, and which has come to dominate the blighted areas where they live.
Women are constantly bombarded with images that represent a small percentage of the female population who are socially deemed “perfect”. These practically unattainable images (due to airbrushing and general photo editing) cranked out from the media send subliminal messages to try and convince women that they need to be concerned with enhancing their natural physical presentation.
Maybe I’m just tired overall and I’m pushing/have pushed myself a bit too far lately. I felt like I had wings and flew a bit too close to the sun. I’m still here writing, so clearly I didn’t completely burn my wings off.
I'd tell you which ones, but I'm not at liberty to say.
about a minute ago · Like
"Headache." What the hell was wrong with her? So much for a Four Knot's duty to protect humans from Wildren. Dora grunted in pain and shook her head - somehow the Sherim, already gently tight around them, carried the motion to him. "Rel, I can't stay here long. It hurts."
The multirange DC-10 was designed and built in Long Beach, California, by Douglas Aircraft Company, now the Long Beach Division of Boeing Commercial Airplanes. Production was started in January 1968 and first deliveries were in 1971. In a production run extending to 1989, 386 commercial DC-10s were delivered, plus 60 KC-10 tanker/cargo models built for the U.S. Air Force.
I sound as if we're living in Washington right now, but not yet. Almost.
Bad gunner tactics: Firing wildly and non-stop, not paying attention to the fact that the belt will eventually burn out and need a chance to cool down. Constantly trying to get higher than what the firing range allows to get that pesky banshee only wastes time. More often than not, frustrated gunners will bail out and stop what can be the deadliest all-round vehicle in Reach.
Anne Hathaway changed dresses again. This is a red dress and I like it. Her hair is again, fabulous.
The stony floor groaned and screeched. The ruby button flew and slithered and bounced from hand to bony hand. In a heartbeat of a sparrow, or maybe a hummingbird, the seven authors tore one another into ribbons of black, warn out fabric that fervently wished they could flutter melodramatically but it was impossible, for there were no windows and no wind in the room of gargoyley chairs.
PDCs are very complex things to try and understand; they transfer a lot of their energy through particle collisions, with a gaseous interstital fluid providing very low viscosity. That means they don’t behave like normal Newtonian fluids such as water. In fact, we really don’t understand the physics behind how these things behave – there’s thousands of papers, numerous research groups, and entire journals specifically aimed at trying to develop a better understanding of granular physics. It’s not even just restricted to volcanism; grain silos, industrial hoppers, snow and rock avalanches, even how your cereal settles in its box – these are all controlled by granular interactions.
“Sparks flew on E Street when the boy prophets walked it handsome and hot.” Bruce sang, the band hit the downbeat and we all tumbled off into the jumbled magic of The E Street Shuffle.
For slapstick comedy, that might simply mean a world where physical principles, such as gravity, are respected. A Chaplinesque figure who falls off a cliff, only to bounce like a ball when he hits the ground, is not funny, at least if he feared to fall in the first place. In a comedy of manners, where misunderstandings, bad timing and offensive behaviour drive the laughs, an audience must recognize enough of their own world, and their own values, to appreciate the situation. And satire, without basis in a familiar world, has nothing to work with. Now, I’m not saying a weird or unlikely character can’t be funny, but I am saying that character needs a more normal world to be weird in.
Great internal linking structure
I must have, because every bride
was our life, watched over, allowed to go
I have a specific reason for taking this approach. In my view, stories are everywhere, but the skill to make a story come alive on the page is far more rare. Transport me into your world with the first line and keep me there to the end. Don't let me wriggle out of your grasp.
This is a great British film, that narrate the live of various characters as Christmas is getting close. This is the ultimate Rom-com not only for the way it was written but also because it is able to melt the heart of even the tough ones.
The menu will be grilled chopped meat, sausages of beef and pork, chicken parts and the salads and condiments traditional to a cook out.
on Pinterest the other day. It is oh so true. I do miss my sweet girl every day. It makes me sad to know MK will never really know her sister. It makes me sad to think of all the 1st we didn't get to have with her. Then I remember those 10 months we did get to have with her. Seeing her do more than the doctors thought she would. Watching her turn her head to look as she heard her Daddy come into a room and started talking. So many things she could do!!
2-3 Tbs. Arrowroot or Potato Starch 1/2 c. organic Rolled Oats
Finding Competent Immigration Legal Advice in the United States
Hon Hai Precision Industry, +44%
Yet the seductive siren song of the caffeine monster called my name. My habit grew. My workplace added one of those handy little pod machines. I rationalized it by saying, “it’s not great, but it’s better than drip.” And with a serious lack of coffee shops of any kind in Walruslandia, I had little choice but to drink drip brewed coffee (or in my preferred term, “swill.” ) whenever I visited Mom and Dad.
- 1/3 cup + 1 tbsp plain soy milk
He rubbed his burrito-bloated belly as the elevator doors opened. "You coming?"
God’s promise to remember His Word is recounted again and again:
nitro sez: not only did i get to clean the skillet, but i got ALL the coffee i wanted this morning. mommer spilled her whole cup, so me an' iggy an' ed went CRAZY all ofur the table while the dbd cleaned the floor. by the time we quit hearin' werds frum the bad werd list an' she got back wif an ol' towel, we had most of it cleaned up. can't say we're not helpers!!
HT: Thank you H.P.
3. Place on a floured surface and knead into a smooth ball. Cover with a damp cloth and let rest 15 minutes.
The book I ended up picking up at the library to sate my appetite for Wodehouse was an early American novel called The Indiscretions of Archie. Archie Moffam (“‘It’s spelt M-o-f-f-a-m, but pronounced Moom.’ / ‘To rhyme,’ said Archie, helpfully, ‘with Bluffinghame.’”) is a pre-Bertie Wooster character showing iconic Wodehousian density of skull, lovability of nature, and tendency toward the absurd. It’s a hilarious book.
But enough of the technical stuff. Basically, I absolutely love acro, it’s my favourite thing to do. I train 4 or 5 times a week which is about 12 hours a week. It may seem a lot but it doesn’t really feel it, and especially as I used to do even more (15 hrs a week) when I was in England. Unfortunately, for medical reasons I’m going to have to cut down to maximum 3 trainings a week (less than 8 hours!) for a while, which will feel very strange for me: I haven’t done that little in years!
all coming together, and wrapped up in one very special little boy and his life
still barking at everyone’s heels, but only
Popular Filipino singer Martin Nievera called for all to vote for Sanchez.
Bill Shrugs. “I dunno” kind of answer.
My goal is to figure out how to cook healthier...better...and not make it such a daunting task. I get overwhelmed quickly when looking at new recipes. I love watching cooking shows and think "well, that does not look to hard." Well, in my kitchen, it apparently is. We all have our strengths, I guess.
"Crimson Cloud is a mother/daughter venture - a way to indulge our joint passion of cardmaking and crafting. We only sell products that we have tried, tested and love using. We have developed our own exclusive range of dies cuts, digital stamps, svg files and "Make Your Own Card" kits which reflect our styles of card making - and hopefully yours too!"
Please, hold that shit in, from now on, until the end of time.
Verizon Wireless-Talk about profiting on death. They really need to have a recently widowed plan. I think I might have spent as much money with them as it cost to bury David in the first three months after he was gone. Fuck you.
p.s..... I still can't seem to figure out how to make my pictures bigger. Seems other blogs have bigger , clearer pictures. Mine look so good...until I post them on blogger...then they loose so much clarity....anyone have any tips? what am I doing wrong ? Any info would be GREATLY appreciated :-)
One of the luggage lessons I’ve learned is that cheap luggage is cheap for a reason. It usually can’t stand up to the rigors of even light travel. Any strain on the zippers or fabric, and you may find yourself hastily repacking your underwear in the middle of an airport concourse. Now, I’ve rarely seen luggage actually being loaded on or off a plane – I’d like to imagine they handle everything with kid gloves. I doubt it though – you’ll want your suitcase to be able to stand up to a few tosses, and having other luggage land on top of it.
Last night, I worked on the first pattern repeat of the Bellevue Cardigan. I'm using Knit One Crochet Too, merino/silk fingering in teal. Once I get past the pattern stitches and into the stockinette, I can add that to the bus knitting rotation.
To put the problem in the simplest terms, the interests of the client continue to be sidelined in the way the firm operates and thinks about making money. Goldman Sachs is one of the world’s largest and most important investment banks and it is too integral to global finance to continue to act this way. The firm has veered so far from the place I joined right out of college that I can no longer in good conscience say that I identify with what it stands for.
I am still a bit giggly over how much fun I had hopping around----I got very, very inspired. :)
The two times I came close to euthanizing him this past week were based on 'criteria' like significant debilitation in hind legs, reduction of appetite, and neuralgia from nerve damage. Taken together, it's no stretch I was ready to let him go.
I hope to soon return to the work of writing. I still have a few more days or maybe weeks of family business to align, but I feel good about the break I've taken, and about the relationships I've strengthened during this pause. But when I do write, whatever it is, I want the end story to be about hope. It was a conscious decision I came to a few months back. It's the right one for me. Today, it was reconfirmed.
The worst thing I've done as a writer was get a professional critique. That's $40 and a lot of self-esteem I'm never getting back. Don't get me wrong -- the critique of my query was extremely helpful. I just threw it in because the package called for it, and ended up scrapping the query and starting over based on his advice. However, when it came to the critique of my first ten pages, it's clear in retrospect that he did not understand the genre I was writing or the audience I was writing for. All his edits were very "by the book" and generally unhelpful, he didn't like my voice, and his closing thoughts were downright degrading. At the time, I took this critique very much to heart -- he was a professional, after all. I can say now that it really hampered my ability to sit down and just write, because I became so worried about judgment and whether I was "following the rules." I still struggle with this.
We are looking for an audience of people who have a vested interest and passion in promoting women in STEM careers. We want your voice and contributions in the discussions so that we can further public policy in this area.
A Tapestry Of War
so, she got a pair of scissors and just cut the poop right out. yup. the bottom of the onesie -- the part with the snaps that keep my shirt from riding up? cut it right on out. snip, snip. she then tucked my new "shirt" into the bottom part of my costume and happily declared "there!"
eyes burned open wide
You Better Hide by The Ding Dongs
I really want to see about some authentic Native American dishes (Cherokee or Sioux), but I'm not sure what that will entail. I need to do some research! Don't want to be eating raw venison or hallucinogenic berries or anything...
Mat 18:15-17 (NEB) “If your brother commits a sin, go and take the matter up with him, strictly between yourselves, and if he listens to you, you have won your brother over. If he will not listen, take one or two others with you, so that all facts may be duly established on the evidence of two or three witnesses. If he refuses to listen to them, report the matter to the congregation; and if he will not listen even to the congregation, you must then treat him as you would a pagan or a tax-collector.
Many women know how to keep them coming back and taking lessons, but others are just looking for the next great tanguero to take them for a ride. Now, that's my direct experience -- some pretty snotty tangueras helping do demotivate the young-at-dance. It's as if the senior tangueros are colluding to maintain a gender imbalance!
Like always, I hope you enjoy this tasty beverage along with my recommendation for the cocktail.
the altered consciousness.
But somehow, from child to adult, we forget how to believe.
There are two ways...
In 1946, Gene Autry rode his horse down the parade route and was so inspired by all of the children yelling "Here comes Santa Claus" that it inspired him to write the now famous song.
Remember compliments you receive, forget the insults. If you succeed in doing this, tell me how.
We are invited, naturally, to think of Proust's A la recherche du temps perdu and Knausgaard has a similar disregard for chronology, his interest lying more with microscopic details, digressions into the place and purpose of art and a desire to conquer the greatest fear/fascination of all: death. If you want plot then look elsewhere. All that really happens in this book is a teenage boy drinks and goes out with the wrong girl and, when a grown man, clears the house in which his father died (and his grandmother still lives). Having 'nigh on imbibed' Proust's masterpiece himself and spent much of his life thinking about the past Knausgaard finds himself on marriage number two with a young family and barely thinking about it at all - 'I believe the main reason for that is our children, since life with them in the here and now occupies all the space. They even squeeze out the most recent past: ask me what I did three days ago and I can't remember.' Perhaps that too is why time no longer seems like a linear journey and why this book follows a different structure. In searching for an image to illustrate this different view of time he alights on a a boat being raised in a lock - 'As time seeps in from all sides our life is essentially the same with only he details changing, and the wait is for the moment when the sluice gates open and real life moves on.'
I had a quick lunch with Frederic at a spot I’m sure I’ll go back to: a take-out joint with good salads, sandwiches and soups at good prices. Afterwards, he walked me over to one of the other two Ogilvy buildings to meet the general CD on LV. Just classic. Classic CD (head to toe black), classic French (older, charming, gracious, and yet a little aloof), classic CD office: gorgeous Corbusier furniture, giant windows overlooking the traffic outside, big desk in the corner and campaign outtakes and photos scattered about. We went through one of the current campaigns and then I was set free for the day.
Ok, without further ado, here are the rest of the lyrics translated:
I'm a planner. Having a child has made me more relaxed, but in order for me to accomplish anything, I need a plan. The same is true with vacations -- I have to plan most of the details in order for anything to get done! Earlier I wrote about choosing a hotel, and today I have a few thoughts about planning activities while on vacation.
I’ve heard that the food served at these events is similar to what you would find a any regular sporting event, so I’m packing my own meals and snacks to eat healthy. Competing in 2 divisions could lead to 10-12 fights if I advance deep in each division, so I need to eat right. I’m packing fruit, gatorade, water, pretzels, electrolyte-carb gu/gummies and homemade wraps/sandwiches!!!
Oh yeah, one more thing. If your wrists are bothering you from typing, a copper bracelet works wonders. I wouldn't have believed it until I put one on. Now I can't take it off. It really does help.
To Quote Bernice Johnson Reagon:
So here are all of my layouts and a card that I made.
Cos I was staring straight at a buffalo’s arse.
-Drug-Related Documentary TV Shows – So, I wasn’t considering a career in Meth-lab operations. Until you showed me how much money could be made. And how to do it. And what usually leads to the cops figuring it out. Thanks to you, I now have all the information I need to be a succesful drug pusher.
This process of writing these “morning pages” as Julia Cameron calls them has helped me think about my writing as well. I’m practicing writing without judgement and look at it simply as a way to learn. Insights are a bonus.
See? I can compromise.
The Canadian Government — petrified of the ANC’s ‘racism’ accusations — appealed the IRB decision before the Canadian Federal Court. On 24 November 2010 Judge James Russell confirmed Huntley’s persecution fears by the SA government. But, he questioned the legitimacy of Huntley’s ‘refugee’ status by claiming there was a lack of ‘objective evidence’ concerning ‘white refugees’ from ‘credible and trustworthy sources’ such as Amnesty International and Human Rights Watch (para 59, 67). He referred Huntley back to the IRB for a new hearing.
Don’t get me wrong:
I am working on finding just the right spot to display a beautiful seascape painted by my talented grandma and am thinking of leaning it against the mirror over our mantle (I need to do some styling before giving a preview).
PAY
As you can imagine from my previous post, to say that I am stressed is an understatement. So after leaving my daily visit to the hospital this evening, I stopped off to grab some Chipotle take-out for dinner and headed into the HomeGoods store across the parking lot for a little retail therapy. It was well worth the trip because I scored a fabulous Ralph Lauren tufted ottoman from the Avalon Collection. I am giddy with excitement. It retails for $879; I paid $299. I have a perfect place for it in the living room which is the next room I will be working on after I finish the bedroom. I have a plan for it already in place!
With this synergetic stability
05 These Days (Live from the Lyceum, London 29 February 1980)
When we last spoke of my intrepid adventures, I'd just found authentic Just the Ten of Us wardrobe and I became thirteen years old again (which is at least a little more grown up than my usual 8.)
- Holly
That’s what you know of as the Lehman crisis.
The presence of the devotees was memorialized on “The New York City Album”, published by Clark Records in the late 1960′s. The album was a collection of quintessential New York sounds including fire trucks, the subway, protestors, garbage collectors, the St. Paddy’s Day parade – and the Hare Krsnas chanting in the Bowery.
As you all know our new CHALLENGE started last week, and will run through to the 25th February. We would love for you to come and play along with us ... here is our inspiration photo again ..
When my mom told me to look outside for my present, it gave me reason to believe that I would be getting a pony, which was at least nine times better than roller-skates. I was so ecstatic about the possibility of getting a real, live, ride-able animal that I temporarily forgot where the door was and began pinging around the house like a gnat on meth.
Even when the situation is at its most dire, there’s always humour in NCIS: LA; it’s part of the show’s charm. I’m really glad that despite being a crossover, each show retained their individual styles.
$0.60 off any 1 Morton Season-All product
I knew a Scotsman
Here is my word count per day:
Some people say, “James will just have to see for himself”.
Remember when I redid the porch I moved where
I'm here with another sneak peek from The Alley Way Stamp's May release! Tie One On is a new favorite of mine. The large tie image was randomly stamped and then masked so the rainbow sentiment could be added as a backdrop. The same sentiment was white embossed on black and adhered over top of a stamping booboo ;) The sentiment is awesome...I love Alison's handwriting!!! It's from the new Mad Gab set which is awesome and a great addition to the already stellar line-up of sentiment sets.
Although this is probably more of a summery dish, I eat it all year around, almost weekly and sometimes even more then that. Maybe it’s an addiction, but if you’ll understand once you try this.
300 ***8. “Law and Morality, By Way of Delphi.” Greek Star, Chicago, Illinois, October 22, 1998, p. 7, October 29, 1998, p. 5, November 5, 1998, p. 8. (Source: Item D-X/28/1982, below.) See Item C-1997(5), above. (Incorporated, in large part, in Item B-7, above, pp. 93-107 (1997).)
This was taken in Maui last month. We attended a black tie dinner. My husband was inducted into his bank's President Club - top 10% of sales for 2011 in his division. So VERY proud of him!
The witch is my other HG purchase. Her skirt says "are you a good witch or a bad witch?" - Love It!!
To cover this Paper Mache box I drew around the lid on Grease Proof Paper and then cut small pieces from the Friendly Plastic to for a Mosaic Pattern. Once happy with the design I carefully turn all the pieces over ... leaving them on the Grease Proof Paper and heat them until they are shiny.
Highway: US 10
First, there are the large conglomerates: Veen Bosch & Keuning (VBK), Weekblad Pers Groep (WPG), Standaard and Lannoo, among others. They each own a variety of publishing houses that operate relatively independently and are often located in different buildings. These firms can’t really be called “imprints,” but they do ultimately report back to the CEO of the group. Second, there are a dozen or so independent publishers who operate professionally within mainstream trade publishing. The third group consists of hundreds of very small publishers who often specialize in narrow subjects and don’t use traditional distribution networks.”
What’s his problem with the Jews? –
Move forward to the 2010 off-season, another championship finals under their belts and the big 3 still intact. The Celtics have gone out and signed the Big Diesel, Shaquille O’Neal, to a 2 year deal worth around $3 million. With the signing of Shaq, the word rebuilding has been taken out of the vocabulary of Boston Celtic fans for at least another season.
In the run up to Diwali, my husbands mom and maami are beseiged with menu requests from their husbands and visiting children. On Chhoti Diwali, the final consensus was for stuffed naan and paneer ki sabji.
We hit a bit of a rough patch but we are working through it. I think it had to do with the fact that we haven’t had much time together, and I wouldn’t count the hour before bed, frantically running around the house getting ourselves organised for the next day, as “quality time”. It’s been tough. But we’ve been more open about our feelings and increased our communication so we don’t end up resenting each other because of it all.
I mentioned before that folks interested in investing should contact me. To my surprise and delight, I've raised over $20,000 to date in investments from fans. If anyone else is interested in investing in the project, I am open to taking another $10,000 in investments (to be repaid, with interest, over an agreed-upon period after the record is released). Email me (carsie@carsieblanton.com) for details.
Fun times, huh?
We cannot build a doctrine based on that. We need more. We need to know what is biblical and what is not, based on the entire bible. Since God is not a God of confusion, He tells us what is His ways and what is not. We know that when we see things mentioned in the bible, as in God’s law in the Old Testament, we also saw it in practice in the scriptures as well. Paul talks about living a life for Christ numerous times in the New Testament and we see many characters in the Gospels doing just that. We also see what Paul wrote to the Churches in Ephesus, Corinth and others, yet again, we see it put into practice in Acts. We also know that the Church of Corinth was a church that was practicing some strange rituals. They had lost their way and Paul’s letter was sent to correct that. That alone should make us suspicious and cause us to question his motives for mentioning baptisms for the dead—if the context to the chapter were not obvious already.
Disc 8A (October 11th 1995) Budokan Hall, Tokyo, Japan
"For your Maker is your husband, the LORD Almighty is his name- the Holy One of Israel is your Redeemer; he is called the God of all the earth. The LORD will call you back as if you were a wife deserted and distressed in spirit.....
To all my buddies: I have disabled the anonymous commenting; so please do let me know if you face any issues in posting comments.
The swamps of the Great Bend area bring up the idea it is raining here. Not badly, that happened early, before sunrise; just the gentle, you’re gonna get real wet if you stay out here type of rain. It’s soaking in well.
Quit my job at The Roof
DOWNLOAD (Uploaded.to)
Hands down if I did not have Eddie to look at everything rationally not emotionally. Eddie always looked at we had to do what was best to get one of our little girls home. Though we would have with out a doubt taken both of them.
I can no longer follow it.
And there’s an official letter from Hogwarts about the train to catch for next year’s classes, the required reading – and a permission form to be signed by a parent or guardian for a third-year student to go off to the village on select weekends. Harry really wants to be able to go, of course, but he doesn’t kow how he’ll be able to convince his uncle or aunt to sign off.
It could be countered that nothing is stopping me. If I want to barter with gold coins, I can go right ahead and do so. Such an argument is false. The tax code taxes any gains earned on gold transactions. For example, if I buy gold at $1,000/ounce and hold it for a year until its price is $1,200/ounce and then trade my gold ounce for something worth $1,200, I’ll have to report $200 of taxable income. Further, it would be illegal for me to loan out money and require repayment in gold. After all, government paper is ”legal tender for all debts, public and private”.
You can start by looking for the obvious things first. Check around your front door. Can you see gaps where light is coming through? Perhaps you can have someone stand outside the door at night with a flashlight and have him or her shine around the edges while you are inside the door. If you see light coming through, then you know cold air can leak into your home that way. To fix that you can go to any hardware store and buy weatherstripping. If you already have weatherstripping around the door, note how thick it is. This will be the same thickness you will buy when you replace it. A typical roll will do one door and costs under $3. In just minutes you can stop that door from being drafty.
Midwinterblood by Marcus Sedgwick
Okay, that's a crappy lead in. But I once heard that in journalism school, they teach you to start with a short, provocative sentence to grip the reader, so I thought I'd give it a try.
The set feels strangely unfinished, as if it was rushed out the door. The Adventure Book has no proper cover, though it looks like it should have one (it's just saddle-stapled paper, like the interior of one of the old modules with detachable covers). Despite that, the production values are relatively high, though the overland map cards do not connect (that is, they seem to be three random samples of the Zakhara map, which I only discovered by looking up a full map on the Internet).
because all this time I’ve been waiting to see you once again.
Hours earlier, about 200 men had assembled outside Lakemba Mosque – some armed with Glock pistols – and dozens more gathered at Campsie. They were preparing to travel to Maroubra Beach, where up to 300 locals, many armed with crowbars, waited for an arranged fight, according to “Bra Boys” at the beach.
Drifting in the dark waters of a mysterious river, the only thing Amelia knows for sure is that she's dead. With no recollection of her past life—or her actual death—she's trapped alone in a nightmarish existence. All of this changes when she tries to rescue a boy, Joshua, from drowning in her river. As a ghost, she can do nothing but will him to live. Yet in an unforgettable moment of connection, she helps him survive.
“Feel: here begins again the rise of the energy from below to the body, but it is not the Sivalingam. It is the raising Kundalini. That is — it comes into the body…”
Papeles: Echo Park: Springtime 6x6
- low intakes of whole grains
is really a gift itself!!
I did not get to go to happy hour after work but my family did spend a happy hour playing outside when daddy came home.
initially owned 48 155mm FH-77B
Many years ago I attended the launch of Christian Dior's J'Adore fragrance. It was the most spectacular launch I've ever been to. As we were standing around a swimming pool full of liquid gold, sipping Champagne from crystal glasses, the supermodel Carmen Kass suddenly emerged from the liquid gold pool, and then, with gold dripping from every perfect bone, walked up the steps of the pool and out the door, a trail of J'Adore wafting behind her. None of us could figure out how she got into the pool (obviously through a trap door in the bottom) and how she pulled off such am amazing entrance without drowning. In saying that, wouldn't be a fabulous way to go?
ISBN: 1862308160
Well I was up for that. So I made my plans and started preparing for my personal rite of passage as practiced by the local residents before the coming of European society. There were some hitches in the plan and I had to modify my personal journey into adulthood accordingly. Not being an observer of orthodox custom I decided to undergo the ritual tomorrow. I was to travel up to the mountains and forests to seek my spirit guide tomorrow after my night shift was over. I would not be dancing and chanting for 48 consecutive hours. I also did not know which animal’s spirit I should align myself with. Nonetheless, I would proceed as best I could.
The man has a cellphone, too! Granted, so does almost everybody nowadays, but if he claims to be so broke that he needs an EBT card to make ends meet, how can he possibly afford even a cheapo phone?
I went back and forth about how to celebrate this fun occasion. I've decided that I want to use this week to reflect on the ups and downs of this whole crazy world of crafting. If you're not so interested in the whole "reflecting" thing - I'll also have a couple of giveaways and lots of projects too. I hope you'll hang out with me and celebrate a year of the good, the bad and the ugly - and boy have their been some uglies - which brings me to today's reflection.
to futures blooming distantly,
About The Author
Sitting on the tarmac in Amsterdam, waiting for the last leg of our trip to begin to Nigeria, I was humored to see that our altitude was MINUS 3 feet. That’s because Amsterdam is “the land of dikes” and lies below sea-level!
Produced by Martin Hannett
The Madison Heights School District has yet to release their statement on the students protesting. We will continue to update this story as soon as we hear from the Madison Heights School District.
Keeping a careful watch on what we were doing
1. The secret of living is giving, if you follow your dreams then you will have something worth sharing with others, hope, inspiration and a meaning to live, and that to me, is a great contribution.
Crystal Jade Korean BBQ
This morning I would like to introduce you to another wonderful artist on Etsy. She is also a member of the PAFA Team and extremely talented to say the least! Please take a minute and read through her interview so that you can get to know a little more about Kris, from Maple Street Shoppe!
444. Deviled Eggs @ Home (Phoenixville, PA)
4 tomato slices
I have been on a few fires at this very location and have pulled hose through some of the back yards that lie behind the fences that you see in the above photo. That wasn't an issue today, the fire was kept north of the bike path. The bike path made it easy for the engines to access the fire as well.
Najeeb Halaby Jr. was a second generation Syrian-American with multiple degrees and was a test pilot in the US Navy in WWII. His father cam here from Ottoman Syria in the late 1800s, they were Christians. His daughter became Queen Noor of Jordan, but Halaby was an American through and through.
Since they came to this area two and a half years ago, the Howleys have proved themselves true friends of Laconia Christian School.
I once worked as a courier in the Southern California area so I became fairly adept at navigating the byways and highways of the counties of Los Angeles, Orange, and San Diego. However, I only delivered inanimate objects (e.g., blueprints, legal documents) and they never complained if I was a wee bit late. The people receiving said inanimate objects were another matter, but I only had to deal with them for 30 seconds. I have a healthy dose of respect for the cabbies in Lima who have to deal with the insane traffic and the less-than-stellar roads.
Who will be my first follower?
Los Angeles Times, 4/22/12
Despite the hard times of the 1930s the food was good though simple. And the open air and brisk activity awakened hearty appetites. The minister prayed and we then pitched in. At the end of the afternoon we had ice cream which almost by itself made the event memorable.
Fone Art Figures - $50-$150
Do pop over to the challenge blog for buckets of inspiration from my teamies and of course we'd love it if you played along too.
Hope to blog again soon when I'm feeling back on track and with photos of the new big educational plans I am hatching for the children. Mwah har har har haaaarrrrr. Power! Power Over Alllllll!!!! Har har har!!
Of course, I have to go back. I have to hit those closed roads or I'll never be satisfied! I hate to leave a road unexplored, especially when they show so much promise! We'll have to explore closer to home for a few years and save our pennies. Maybe I'll have that cute teardrop trailer that I dream of, and we can go off and explore the west again. Anyway, that's my plan and I'm stickin to it!
“So what’s your daddy’s name?” Pouring a cup of coffee from the pot on the table,Tara’s eyes lit up a little as she listened for Emily’s answer.
All I have to do is look at Trisha and tilt my head north and she says "Let's go!" We drove through Shelburne Falls, Colraine and into Jacksonville, Vermont. There is a little store there we like to stop at. It smells like Patchouli and is filled with beads, peace flags, jewelry, incense, tarot cards, yoga mats, India bedspreads, "smoking paraphenalia," gemstones, smudge sticks...you name it. The place takes us back to the Psychedelic Shop in 1968! We bought a few treasures and left to drive home a different way, (cause you gotta!) route 8A into Charlemont. Another little store, this one is the local bakery, deli, liquor and gift store. Another cup of coffee and a snack for the road. We chattered and laughed all day, making plans to go to Niagara Falls later in the year, telling stories about this and that. A lovely early Spring afternoon!
Panama
I couldn't help but put these silly birds together with this fractured funny! At least for me, it seemed fitting to have this card somewhat mimic my neighborhood friends in our last duty station! We were silly like that! I stamped the image and colored it in with Copics. I used American Crafts dp and some scrap SU! Turquoise cs. I could have embellished this card but the image is a good size that I didn't want to cover anymore of the dp as I felt the chicken wire look fit it well. I used some left over dp for an inside strip before stamping the sentiment with Momento Black ink.
The Sketch:
“Unt who are you to say vot is a man of medicine, you shtoopid animal-inspector? You who have only examined ze hindquarters of donkeys and cows! You zink some dumpkoff in medical school can teach me anyzing? I who have studied ze formation of galaxies unt ze lifecycle of stars! I am fully self-taught in ze mechanics unt dynamics of ze human body. I am aware of ze exact location of every bone, every fibre….”
I chose this one because I credit this one with changing my perspective on the human race and evolution, and led me into quite a long phase where I did a lot of research on the human species and the issue of creationism and evolution. It also solidified some religious beliefs I had been uncertain about for quite a while. For some reason, this book really had a profound effect on me spiritually as well as mentally. It was also one of those books where I had to be ready to read it as I had three false starts before I finally sat down one night and read it in its entirety in one sitting. Let's just say I had a hard time concentrating at school the next day! LOL
Monday we were able to get a loaner from the garage (a cute little C1 that was super fun to drive actually!) so I could get to work and back for the rest of the week. The insurance "expert" wasn't able to come see the car until Wednesday and the garage isn't allowed to do anything until the expert does his thing, but they did plan ahead and order all the parts they needed in advance. Everything went super quick and Stéphane picked up the car this morning.
13. I find that my finger works best for getting texture in the paste. Simply dab your finger up and down and feel the schloop, now known as the schloopy, schloopy technique! Dry with the heat gun. You can add extra texture to this product as it bubble with the heat from the heat gun. Beware of thick areas of paste, you can get some mighty big bubbles!!!!
The mountain in the background is Elk Mountain and we spent a fair amount of time traversing around on there throughout the week.
Our household is in the midst of a shift right now. I can't write about it just yet. But soon. Soon I will be able to tell you that I've joined the circus.
Last month, I took Ecological Economics. My one and only Concentration course of the year. Particularly interesting was our discussion on degrowth. I also wrote a research paper on the role of social capital in natural resource management, and realized that I want to integrate some sort of study about social capital into my Keystone project that I will be completing next year. I have been thinking about Keystone more and more.
Nereu Gargalo, vocalist and percussionist
Daddy: ”Well I were thinking along them lines yes”
Our household already has a useful stash of shopping bags, and are in the routine of using them, but I realized we could do with some reusable produce bags. Although we re-use them a lot of the time, I found that we were always coming home with a few more plastic produce bags every time we bought our fruit and veg. Inspired by some handmade mesh produce bags I saw on flickr, and this tutorial from Wisdom of the Moon, I hit our local second hand shops and found a sheer mesh curtain to re-purpose. One evening with my overlocker (aka serger) later I had a set of 10 mesh bags.
Whizz together all the ingredients in a blender. Taste, add more sugar if you think it needs it.
* Rain in the evening after a very hot day
I have arrived.safe and sound. The plane ride over was just long... No two ways about it.. Long.. 7 hours in, I sat there..dismayed..that there were still 6 hours to go...
Once we reached Carate, there was a forty minute walk on the beach to reach the lodge. This place was definitely remote. We had the privilege of sharing our walk with one of the kitchen staff at the lodge. He spoke little English and we knew even less Spanish, but we managed to talk almost the entire walk. It’s amazing how you can still communicate with people even if you don’t share a common language.
09-25 Tampa Bay, FL – USF Sun Dome #
Do you recognise these names?
09 Summer in Paris
This picture was taken of from my hotel room. We stayed at Harbor Plaza Resort City in Tin Shui Wai. The hotel was nice but it was a bit out of the way....about 45 mins from anything. So...we hopped on a Taxi to Ya Ma Tei for dim sum.... which was amazing! Especially the Ma Lai Koh; so soft, and chewy with the right sweetness, and richness....
2. Sequence 2 (2:24)
Designer Paper - Creative Imaginations
Mr. Javed Akhtar, Mr. Shaharyaar, Prof. Waseem Barelvi, Ms. Deepti Mishra, Mr. Anwar Jalalpuri, Mr. Bekal Utsahi, Manzar Bhopali, Popular Meeruti, Iqbal Ashar to name a few from India
Disney Prep & Landing ... ABC Family ... 5 PM
I can cook, and not just frozen pizza, or TV dinners. My wife and I always disagree about who will cook. She evens get into it with the girls sometimes. But being the kind of guy that I am, and no I am not a smart ass all the time, or a jackass that I have been told I am. I let her cook. But when it comes to steaks or anything on the grill, I AM KING, OK so my wife lets me do that part.
With this background knowledge, why is Phil Pringle inviting the cult-like leader Kong Hee to speak at this years Presence Conference? He is not faithful to scripture, faithful to the church, faithful to the poor or faithful to the community. Hee is continually misrepresenting Jesus for worldly reasons.
I have such a hard time getting a soft edge with acrylics. So I thought of giving a sponge a try. I like it. These clouds look softer than anything I've produced so far.
A loon called and another answered. There was a quiet murmur of water trickling in a tiny waterfall over a series of fallen logs. A softshell turtle as big as a turkey platter warmed itself on a flat rock in a dappled beam of sunlight. A lone white-tailed deer flicked its ears and tail as it turned to watch the man with the blue helmet. An insect crawled into the pitfall of a Pitcher plant. The U.N. scout wiped sticky sweat from his brow with his uniform sleeve.
That they somehow need to be ‘protected’ from the world, or shielded from reality. And whether it’s as infantile as trying to remove curse words from YA literature, or ban offensive books, or refusing to talk honestly and openly about drugs or sex or whatever, it all adds up to one thing – BS condescension.
10 minute AMRAP:
Suu Kyi has defended her decision to run despite the irregularities and argues that these by-elections have served a greater function of boosting the people’s interest in politics. Daw (Auntie) Suu’s symbolic significance cannot be overestimated, nor can her influence over large sections of the Burmese population, who trust her absolutely as the nation’s true leader.
Then it dawned on her that she’d been healed of her disease. Overwhelmed with
Moving along in finishing up our outside projects, we got our pendant for our entry way and installed it this week. Yay for light!
Traits: Literate, Swimming, Second Language (Spanish), Second Language (French), Officer Patron (Col. Lord Wintergreen), Educated, Cosmopolitan, Letter from London.
I’m always throwing bait out to try and get a reaction from a crowd, not so much because I’m attention seeking (that’s a given when you’re up onstage with a guitar!), but so I can get some kind of reading of what the level of mood is etc and play to/with them accordingly.
When Jude writes in verse 17 and 18 that there will be scoffers it is a clear warning that the Christian life is not exempt from the trials and frustrations of our lives. In fact, it seems quite clear to me that Christians are probably more vulnerable to the problems in our life.
In addition, his articles on the Adies have long been available through the Gurdjieff International Review, and are still available on the Review’s web site. Mrs Adie’s role in the transmission of the Gurdjieff music is becoming better known through her three-CD set, Music of the Search, which is now available.
What inspires you as a designer?
This is an intelligent, well-written, carefully-plotted novel; loose ends are tied up and he even has time for a neat twist at the very end. A lot of thought has gone into it. Yes, there is a serious amount of bloodshed and it is described in detail but not without a certain black humour:
Original Flag Porter
And the person who took me to another level – in fact to levels I had not ever been before… not even “during my prime”. God Bless the day of 1 April 2010 when Dr Aniza Zain Ahmed was curious enough to investigate one weirdo whose comments at Rocky’s Bru had intrigued her (and whose pen-name also coincides with one of her products) … my best friend who is now my wife and the best step-mother anyone could ever hope for. But don’t take my word for it – ask my children:-)
Indian roads will be bumpy with a volume of potholes. Therefore, a car which could have a smooth and comfortable experience on all these bumps is known as the very best here.
like when sensations at the faucet are what
4.) How long have you been agenting? (Newish agents can be awesome. They're hungry, eager, and full of vigor. But, inexperience has potential downsides if they're not mentored through their apprenticeship years. Don't be afraid to ask a new agent who their agent mentor is.)
I am wondering if the dreams I’ve been having lately are a possible side-effect though. Every night, at least once during the night, I dream weird, weird dreams. Last week I dreamed I was in a shallow tank, wrangling an electric eel. I was doing quite well until the head turned on me and bit me like a snake on my hand. And it hurt. In my dream I remember being in such pain. So much so that I woke up sweaty and shaky. Other than that, my dreams have been very normal and plain.
or the start
Sorry for the abrupt end to my post, but my 6th grader is now telling me he has an essay to type. I guess this is my cue to get off the computer.
I’m also considering organizing a weekend-long online read-in that would be open to anyone who’s interested, but that’s still swimming around in the ether that is my brain. Would anyone be interested in participating in something like that?
Drummond's bar began construction on a new building to increase their business..
DOB has re-inspected each of the three residential properties.
Another post from me today, the last one was scheduled so I'm not as good as I seem, lol. I've had time to do another card for fun, I really should be getting ahead with myself with DT stuff but I had to make this card.
By now, Anselme landed before the dragon, seeking to recover Leone’s remains before the high priests could animate them; the dragon turned upon the druid, laying him out with a series of blows which left him bleeding on the dusty battleground. Zantric strode to engage the towering dragon, yet the fighter was battered in kind and sent sailing by a slap of the undead beast’s tail–only surviving by virtue of a surge of heroics and a plea to Torag as he was laid out.
In the end, Goslee was undone by her habit of simply inventing evidence to substantiate Nifong’s claims. A few minutes after she made the bizarre assertion about Reade Seligmann’s DNA quoted in the header, show host Tucker Carlson broke into another segment:
I heard a laugh that was closer than I wanted it to be. Come on Simon, ask her.
one time it will be you
Having been through three deployments already, you think one would become a pro at it. Simple truth: they don't get easier. Not to mention every one I've been through have been month long deployments, not seven or eight. I've been blessed on those short deployments to be able to talk to him every couple days, if not every day, at least through email. Therefore, this one is going to be brutal. I can already feel it creeping up one me. I know soon its going to be tapping on my shoulder and then I'm going to face the big bad D in its face. Oh how much joy that will be.
So tonight I cleaned out the fridge and made punch. I had 4 partial bottles of various sweet wines that I had tried, one was apple-maple, one was chamomile, one was blackberryish, and the other a merlot. I dumped them all in a gallon jug with a spigot on it and added a bottle of cherry cider from Trader Joe's! Only 1/3 was wine and the rest cherry cider--Voila, punch with a little punch! Enough to make a wine connoisseur cringe--I wouldn't make a steady diet of it, but it will give me a little evening sip.
We doused the lights, lit all the candles, and we each started working on our respective laptops (her grandpa gave her a used one for Christmas which helps tremendously since we don't have to share mine any more!). I fiddled with my manuscript while she typed away, and I thought about retreating to my "fun" project instead of tackling the current novel. Yet something held me back, and as I kept fiddling, suddenly, it happened.
The back of the book includes lined pages so that readers can journal along their journey.
i have not been posting much lately. i can't say i haven't had time to get on here. i just haven't made the time. it hasn't seemed as important as taking in moments that are happening. bella is busy, constantly. chasing her and keeping her entertained has become more time consuming than ever. and also more rewarding.
Eaux Bonnes: "It is said to produce excellent results in clergyman's sore throat"
Galaktoboureco- Ga-Iak-to-b6ureco
And then you loop back round to, well, just do it - if peopledontgiveashit they'll stay away, right? I reckon it stems from a fear of being judged, like - why are you talking about how many words you've written or what kind of notebooks you use in a public place???
pps: oh! here's me being random. because i can. buahahahahahaa!! =p
I decided to colour a Bugaboo digi image for this one and use the "Dear Santa" stamp again. I had bought some Christmas stamps but didn't get around to using them (my 8yr old got lots of use out of them though ... you can check out her blog here). I like the idea of taking a general stamp and turning it into a Christmas card with the colouring, design of the card and the embellishments ...
'Certainly,' said I; 'and I have heard that the first-class carriages are very comfortable, and the smell arising from the steam has been much exaggerated.'
5) The suggestion that the Clinton camp would have exposed him ignores the reality of Democrat politics. If Hilary Clinton had exposed a young black Senator and potential Presidential candidate as lying about his citizenship, the Democratic Party Convention would nave risen up as one and torn her to shreds. In addition she would have lost the black vote upon which any democratic politician depends.
Ain’t nothin’ else to do around here just a game children play
living room:
Don’t overdo it. Remember these are the plants for nonplant people. A little bit of feeding goes a long way. Use a diluted houseplant fertilizer.
This was a combined operation between the Gizeh Intelligence and the Federal Reserve.
Some people have been telling me to follow my heart and do what makes me happy. In the end we all die right? In the end we will see all of the things we have done, right? I don't want to be close to death thinking "Oh, I didn't get the chance to do everything I wanted... I regret everything, I should've done different, it'd be much better..." I don't that, you know... I want to look back and think "Wow, I've been so happy, there's nothing I'd like right now, I have fulfilled my dreams!"
Brandon Holstein: exactly.
I am so happy to be back and visiting Our Craft Lounge as the artist of the month (still pinching myself!). Today I am excited to show a sample using the beautiful stamp set: Fishing with Dad which is perfect for all the men in our lives! This one I made for my dear FIL who loves to fish - whether it be in the summer or in the winter (in a house on a frozen lake!). I love the sentiment: "To the best fisherman" - and the stamps remind me of the stories that my DH tells me of the summer he went up fishing to Canada with his dad.
I never thought I would apply to Teach For America–not because I didn’t want to teach or work in tough schools or devote myself to helping children, but because I have an undergraduate degree in education and have always been resentful that I wasn’t able to find a teaching job in NYC the traditional way after graduation.
I will probably repeat some things, in this story, that I've said before. I can't remember all that I share, but the events keep spilling out, through different tellings, here and there... so please bare with me, as the pieces continue to fall back together, that were once scattered to the winds.
I trade on the Forex market (XAUUSD pair) through FXDD. Not all brokers offer gold trading via Forex.
Fareda: Stop making excuses for me, Anwaar. I said no and I meant it.
But where did marketing strategist come from? It came from the recession. No longer did working in marketing require thinking. It became like advertising, a tactic, or rather, a group of tactics. Why? Because marketers who are tactical based are cheaper. They do what they’re told (in an ideal world). But who tells them what to do? Leadership is now mainly comprised of junior people who have “titled up”. An entire working generation has lived with doing work without raises or bonuses, being told to be happy that they have a job, and regardless of conditions, they were. Instead of raises they got titles and promotions.
The 22nd I am having Essure put in. For those of you that don't know what that is, it is permanent birth control. Before I get an ass load of comments and questions I will tell you this: a. I am SURE and we are SURE b. I only ever wanted one kid (even when I was married to Mike) and I got a boy ipso facto so I am set on that front and c. if we decide that we simply have to have another child we will adopt a kid that needs a good life
After colouring it, I cut it out and glazed it over with Royal Coat Dimensional Magic and let it dry.
Grab a piece of stem part and bend it.
I found these cute clear tags
